Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB895.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS CHAPTER 239 IS ESTABLISHED AND A NEW
SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Board" means the State Regulated Products Control Board;
(2) "Cannabinoid" means a compound found in the hemp plant Cannabis sativa L.
from a United States Department of Agriculture sanctioned domestic hemp
production program or a Kentucky sanctioned hemp-derived cannabinoid
product program;
(3) "Cannabis":
(a) Means marijuana as defined in Section 23 of this Act when cultivated,
harvested, processed, produced, transported, dispensed, distributed, sold,
possessed, or used in accordance with this chapter;
(b) Includes cannabis products; and
(c) Does not include:
1. Industrial hemp or industrial hemp products;
2. Hemp-derived cannabinoids; and
3. Medicinal cannabis as defined in Section 24 of this Act;
(4) "Cannabis-infused beverage":
(a) Means a properly permitted adult-use cannabinoid liquid product intended
for human consumption that has intoxicating properties that change the
function of the nervous system and results in alterations of perception,
cognition, or behavior;
(b) Shall not contain more than five (5) milligrams of adult-use cannabinoids
per twelve (12) ounce serving, within a twenty percent (20%) variance or a
variance established by the department, whichever is lower; and
Page 1 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(c) Shall not include:
1. Medicinal cannabis defined in Section 24 of this Act
2. Any type of hemp tincture; and
3. Any product containing solely nonintoxicating cannabinoids;
(5) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of the Department of Psychoactive
Substances;
(6) "Cultivating" means planting, growing, and harvesting a plant or crop;
(7) "Department" means the Department of Psychoactive Substances established in
Section 2 of this Act;
(8) "Final hemp-derived cannabinoid product":
(a) Means any final product derived from hemp that:
1. Contains cannabinoids in any form; and
2. Is intended for human or animal use through any means of
application or administration, such as inhalation, ingestion, or topical
application; and
(b) Shall not include:
1. Hemp cigarettes;
2. Hemp cigars;
3. Chew, dip, or other smokeless material consisting of hemp leaf
material or hemp floral material; and
4. Hemp leaf material or floral material teas;
(9) "Hemp":
(a) Means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the
seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids,
salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a total
tetrahydrocannabinols concentration, including tetrahydrocannabinolic
acid, concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on
Page 2 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
a dry weight basis; and
(b) Does not include medicinal cannabis as defined in Section 24 of this Act;
(10) "Hemp-derived cannabinoid product" means any intermediate hemp-derived
cannabinoid product or final hemp-derived cannabinoid product;
(11) "Hemp products" or "industrial hemp products":
(a) Means products derived from, or made by, processing hemp plants or plant
parts; and
(b) Does not include medicinal cannabis products as defined in Section 24 of
this Act;
(12) "Industrial hemp" means hemp:
(a) Grown for the use of the stalk of the plant, fiber produced from such a stalk,
or any other non-cannabinoid derivative, mixture, preparation, or
manufacture of such a stalk;
(b) Grown for the use of the whole grain, oil, cake, nut, hull, or any other non-
cannabinoid compound, derivative, mixture, preparation, or manufacture of
the seeds of such plant;
(c) Grown for purposes of producing microgreens or other edible hemp leaf
products intended for human consumption that are derived from an
immature hemp plant that is grown from seeds that do not exceed a total
tetrahydrocannabinols concentration, including tetrahydrocannabinolic
acid, of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) in the plant on a dry weight
basis;
(d) That does not enter the stream of commerce and is intended to support
hemp research at an institution of higher education or an independent
research institute; or
(e) Grown for the use of a viable seed of the plant produced solely for the
production or manufacture of any material described in paragraphs (a)
Page 3 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
through (d) of this subsection;
(13) "Intermediate hemp-derived product" means a hemp-derived cannabinoid
product that is:
(a) Not yet in the final form or preparation marketed or intended to be used or
consumed by a human or animal; or
(b) A powder, liquid, tablet, oil, or other product form which is intended or
marketed to be mixed, dissolved, formulated, or otherwise added to or
prepared with or into any other substance prior to administration or
consumption;
(14) "Kentucky sanctioned hemp-derived cannabinoid product program" means a
state regulatory framework established under this chapter that oversees the legal
processing, testing, distribution, and retail sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid
products;
(15) "License" means any license issued under this chapter;
(16) "Licensee" means any holder of a license issued by the department under this
chapter;
(17) "Marketing" means promoting or selling a product within the Commonwealth, in
another state, or outside of the United States. Marketing includes efforts to
advertise and gather information about the needs or preferences of potential
consumers or suppliers, but shall not include these actions if they are part of
legitimate scholarly research or studies;
(18) "Premises" means the land, buildings, and vehicles in which any business
regulated by this chapter is operated or performed;
(19) "Processing" means converting an agricultural commodity into a marketable
form;
(20) "Regulated adult-use product" means any product meant for human
consumption that:
Page 4 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(a) Has intoxicating properties that change the function of the nervous system
and results in alterations of perception, cognition, or behavior;
(b) May be lawfully produced, distributed, sold, given away, and consumed in
Kentucky;
(c) Includes but is not limited to a solid, liquid, or gas containing cannabinoids,
kratom, kava, psychoactive mushrooms, or other lawful adult-use products
as determined by the department;
(d) Is regulated by the department;
(e) Is not an alcoholic beverage as defined by Section 26 of this Act; and
(f) Is not an industrial hemp product;
(21) "Regulated product" means any product regulated by the department under this
chapter, including nonintoxicating products and products not meant for human
consumption. Regulated products include regulated adult-use products;
(22) "Regulated product business establishment" means a business involved in the
regulated products industry that is licensed by the department in this chapter;
(23) "THC" means Delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol, Delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol,
Delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol, and the optical isomer of these substances;
(24) "Total Tetrahydrocannabinol" means the sum of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
(delta-9 THC) and 87.7% of the delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCA)
concentration;
(25) "University" means an accredited institution of higher education located in the
Commonwealth; and
(26) "Wet" has the same meaning as in KRS 241.010.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is established within the Public Protection Cabinet the Department of
Psychoactive Substances. The department shall be responsible for the oversight,
Page 5 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
regulation, and enforcement of the possession, production, processing, testing,
packaging, transportation, marketing, sale, and use in the Commonwealth of
regulated products and regulated adult-use products. In fulfilling these duties
and responsibilities, the department may exercise the powers and duties
authorized in this chapter.
(2) The department shall administer statutes relating to, and regulate traffic in,
regulated products and regulated adult-use products, except that the collection of
taxes shall be administered by the Department of Revenue.
(3) The department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor.
The commissioner shall serve for a term of three (3) years and may be
reappointed. The commissioner shall have at least five (5) years of demonstrated
experience or expertise in the direct management, supervision, and operation of a
business. Once appointed, the commissioner may be removed during his or her
term only for good cause and with appropriate notice.
(4) The department shall establish a Regulated Products Control Board, which shall
consist of the commissioner of the department and two (2) persons appointed by
the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet with approval of the Governor, one
(1) of whom shall be a person with administrative experience in the field of hemp
control. One (1) of these persons shall serve as administrator of the Division of
Hemp, and the other shall serve as administrator of the Division of Kratom. The
commissioner shall serve as the board chair.
(5) Specific functions, powers, and duties of the department and the commissioner
include but are not limited to:
(a) Through the Regulated Products Control Board, promulgating reasonable
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A governing
procedures relating to the applications for and granting, denial, or
revocation of licenses, the supervision and control of the use, manufacture,
Page 6 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
sale, transportation, storage, marketing, and trafficking of regulated
products, and all other matters over which the board has jurisdiction;
(b) Maintaining records of all licenses and permits issued and revoked within
the state. These records shall be current and shall include the identity of all
licensees, including the names of the officers and directors of corporate
licensees and the location of all licensed premises;
(c) Inspecting or providing for the inspection of any premises where regulated
products are cultivated, produced, tested, packaged, transported, or sold;
(d) Prescribing forms of applications for licenses and permits under this
chapter;
(e) Delegating the powers granted in this section to other officers or employees
as determined by the commissioner;
(f) Exercising the powers and performing the duties relating to the
administration of this chapter, including but not limited to budgetary and
fiscal matters;
(g) Entering into contracts, memoranda of understanding, and agreements to
effectuate the policy and purpose of this chapter;
(h) Coordinating across state agencies and departments in order to research
and study any changes in regulated product use and the impact that
regulated product use and the regulated product industries may have on
access to regulated products, public health, and public safety; and
(i) Issuing guidance and industry advisories.
(6) A Division of Hemp, under the supervision of the board, shall administer the laws
in relation to traffic in cannabinoids.
(7) A Division of Kratom, under the supervision of the board, shall administer the
laws in relation to the traffic in kratom.
(8) The board may establish additional divisions for controlling regulated products
Page 7 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
and regulated adult-use products, under the supervision of the board, if the board
deems it necessary to administer the laws relating to the traffic in regulated
products and regulated adult-use products.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department shall have broad authority to establish the conditions under
which regulated products and regulated adult-use products are possessed,
produced, processed, tested, packaged, transported, marketed, sold, and used by
adults in the Commonwealth, including but not limited to the following powers
and duties:
(a) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to implement this chapter;
(b) Establish the number of licenses that may be issued within the following
licensing categories:
1. Processing and manufacturing;
2. Testing;
3. Distribution;
4. Retail sales;
5. Special events;
6. Retail consumption;
7. Transportation;
8. Direct shipper licenses; and
9. Any other category deemed necessary and as authorized under this
chapter;
(c) Establish jurisdictional, space, and other requirements relating to the
issuance of licenses;
(d) Establish limitations on the number of licenses that may be held by any
Page 8 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
person, except that a person shall not hold more than two (2) different
license types, and the holder of a testing license shall not hold any other
type of license. The department shall use its licensing authority to prevent
monopolies and concentration of ownership among a few regulated product
or regulated adult-use product business entities, favoring instead a broad
array of licensed regulated product and regulated adult-use product
business entities with different ownership;
(e) Grant, suspend, revoke, and deny licenses;
(f) Establish product standards and requirements, including the types, forms,
and concentration of products that may be processed and sold;
(g) Limit or prohibit, in the event of a declared emergency, and without
previous notice or advertisement, the processing, transportation, testing, or
sale of any regulated products and regulated adult-use products during the
period of the declared emergency;
(h) Enforce this chapter; and
(i) Hold hearings, subpoena witnesses, compel witness attendance, administer
oaths, examine any person under oath, and require the production of books
and records relative to an inquiry.
(2) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A for both regulated products and regulated adult-use products
that:
(a) Establish requirements for secure transportation between business
establishments;
(b) Establish sanitary standards for retail preparation;
(c) Establish testing programs;
(d) Establish requirements for health and safety warning labels to be placed on
regulated products and regulated adult-use products to be sold or offered
Page 9 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
for sale to a consumer;
(e) Establish a scale of registration, licensing, and renewal fees, based upon the
cost of enforcing this chapter and the size and category of the business
being licensed, as follows:
1. The department shall charge each person seeking a license an
application fee, and shall establish initial licensing and renewal fees;
2. Fees may vary depending upon the nature and scope of the activities
licensed;
3. The total registration and licensing fees assessed under this chapter
shall be set at an amount that will generate sufficient total revenue to,
at a minimum, fully cover the total costs of administering this chapter;
and
4. All registration and licensure fees shall be set on a scaled basis by the
department, and shall be established based on the size and capacity of
the business. For social and economic equity applicants these fees may
be assessed to accomplish the goals of this chapter;
(f) Establish requirements for the form, content, and all records and accounts
by licensees;
(g) Establish reporting requirements;
(h) Set appropriate dosage, potency, concentration, packaging, content, and
serving size limits and delineate requirements for regulated products and
regulated adult-use products;
(i) Establish labeling and packaging requirements for regulated products and
regulated adult-use products sold by a business establishment that include
but are not limited to:
1. A universal symbol to indicate that a regulated adult-use product
contains intoxicating substances, and prescribe how the product and
Page 10 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
product packaging shall utilize and exhibit this symbol;
2. A disclosure concerning the length of time it typically takes for the
intoxicating substances to affect an individual, including a statement
that certain forms of regulated adult-use products take longer to have
an effect;
3. A list of ingredients and all additives;
4. Child-resistant packaging;
5. A net weight statement;
6. A recommended use-by or expiration date;
7. Labeling that specifically indicates that the package contains
regulated products or regulated adult-use products; and
8. Standard and uniform packaging and labeling, including but not
limited to requirements regarding branding or logos;
(j) Restrict forms of regulated product and regulated adult-use product delivery
systems to ensure consumer safety and deter public health concerns;
(k) Establish reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions on outdoor
advertising of regulated products and regulated adult-use products
consistent with this chapter;
(l) Establish security and safety requirements and protocols for the places
where regulated products and regulated adult-use products are possessed,
produced, tested, packaged, transported, marketed, and sold in the
Commonwealth; and
(m) Establish policies and procedures for retail establishments that sell both
regulated adult-use products pursuant to this chapter and medicinal
cannabis pursuant to KRS Chapter 218B to separate the two (2) functions
sufficiently so that:
1. Inventory and sales can be tracked separately; and
Page 11 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
2. Medicinal cannabis products are not sold under this chapter.
(3) The department shall adopt and exclusively enforce the administrative
regulations of the Department for Public Health relating to the distribution and
retail sale of regulated adult-use products until the Regulated Products Control
Board promulgates its own administrative regulations on the subject on or before
July 1, 2027, except that cannabis-infused beverages shall follow the
administrative regulations authorized by Section 10 of this Act and license fee
structures shall change in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(4) On and after January 1, 2027, the annual license fees for regulated adult-use
products shall be as follows:
(a) Processor or Manufacturer ...............................................................$1,000.00
(b) Gift shop package ..................................................................................$110.00
(c) Wholesaler ..........................................................................................$1,000.00
(d) Retail package ........................................................................................$500.00
(e) Transporter ............................................................................................$210.00
(f) Direct shipper .....................................................................................$1,000.00
(g) Cannabis-infused beverage manufacturer license ...............................$500.00
(h) Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license ...............................$1,000.00
(i) Cannabis-infused beverage retail license .............................................$500.00
(j) Testing facility license ...........................................................................$300.00
(k) Retail consumption license ....................................................................$500.00
(5) The license fees established in subsection (4) of this section shall remain in effect
until the board issues updated license fees through the promulgation of an
administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A no later than
January 1, 2028.
(6) The department may delegate any of its powers or duties established in this
chapter to the board, unless that delegation is specifically prohibited.
Page 12 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person shall not process, produce, test, transfer, transport, or sell regulated
adult-use products or otherwise operate a regulated adult-use products
establishment in this state without first obtaining a license or permit under this
chapter.
(2) A processor license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Purchase hemp from a cultivator for processing;
(b) Receive regulated adult-use products from a cultivator, transporter, testing
facility, or another processor;
(c) Process or manufacture the regulated adult-use products received into
intermediate products or regulated adult-use products;
(d) Sell the processed regulated adult-use products to another processor, a
wholesaler, or a retailer licensee;
(e) Transport or contract to transport the intermediate regulated adult-use
products:
1. To another processor;
2. To a testing facility; or
3. Between buildings on its own premises;
(f) Transport or contract to transport the final regulated adult-use products:
1. To another processor, wholesaler, or retailer licensee;
2. To a testing facility; or
3. Between buildings on its own premises;
(g) Obtain processing licenses at multiple locations; and
(h) Conduct the following activities as part of the processor’s license so long as
the licensee is a Kentucky hemp processor and is located in wet territory or
any precinct that has authorized the limited sale of a regulated adult-use
Page 13 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
product at licensed processor facilities:
1. Operate a gift shop or retail package outlet on its premises;
2. Sell regulated adult-use products for on-premise consumption;
3. Be permitted to transfer its products from the processor premises to
the location where those retail sales occur without having to transfer
physical possession of those regulated adult-use products to a licensed
wholesaler in accordance with the following:
a. Without otherwise reporting those regulated adult-use products
to a licensed wholesaler, report those retail sales and pay all
taxes required to the Department of Revenue at the time and in
the manner required by the Department of Revenue in
accordance with its powers under KRS 131.130(3); and
b. All other regulated adult-use products that are produced by the
processor shall be sold and physically transferred in compliance
with all other relevant provisions of this chapter;
4. Transport regulated adult-use products to a wholesaler, retailer,
testing facility, or between processors;
5. Host events;
6. Hold a direct shipper license;
7. Transport and sell to consumers at fairs, festivals, and other similar
types of events located in a wet territory; and
8. Self-distribute cannabis-infused beverages in the same manner as
distilled spirits except a processor may deliver to any licensed retailer
up to seventy-seven thousand five hundred (77,500) gallons of
cannabis-infused beverages annually.
(3) A transporter license shall not be required to transport industrial hemp products.
A transporter license shall authorize the licensee to:
Page 14 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(a) Receive regulated products from a testing facility and transport to a
processor;
(b) Receive regulated products from a processor and transport the regulated
products to a processor, wholesaler, retailer, or testing facility;
(c) Receive regulated products from a retailer and transport them to a testing
lab;
(d) Transport between testing facilities or processors; and
(e) Transport regulated products to fairs, festivals, and other similar events on
behalf of a license holder permitted to sell at these types of events.
(4) A wholesale license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Purchase regulated products from a processor;
(b) Transport products between processors, retailers, and the wholesaler’s
licensed premises; and
(c) Transport and sell to consumers at fairs, festivals, and other similar types of
events located in a wet territory.
(5) A retail license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Purchase regulated products from a processor or wholesaler for sale in its
place of business;
(b) Receive purchased regulated products from a processor, wholesaler, or
testing facility;
(c) Sell regulated adult-use products at its store to consumers ages twenty-one
(21) and older;
(d) Host events;
(e) Purchase and receive regulated product accessories;
(f) Transport regulated products:
1. From a processor to a testing facility;
2. To a testing facility;
Page 15 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
3. Between retail locations; and
4. To consumers;
(g) Sell regulated products to consumers at fairs, festivals, and other similar
types of events located in a wet territory; and
(h) Hold a direct shipper license.
(6) A retail license shall not apply to:
(a) Industrial hemp products;
(b) Hemp products defined as nonintoxicating by the department; and
(c) Other regulated products determined by the department to be
nonintoxicating.
(7) A testing facility license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Obtain, store, and test samples of regulated products:
1. To determine the concentration of psychoactive substances in the
products; and
2. For other contaminants and impurities that may support the quality
control measures necessary to confirm product quality; and
(b) Perform any other activities defined by the department to ensure product
quality and safety.
(8) A regulated product retail consumption license shall authorize the licensee to sell
regulated products, excluding kratom, for on-premises consumption. A retail
consumption license may be combined with a retail license or a cannabis-infused
beverage license.
(9) A regulated product event organizer license shall authorize the licensee to host
temporary events related to regulated products, including but not limited to
concerts, conferences, fairs, festivals, and competitions. Each event hosted by a
licensed regulated product event organizer shall require a separate cannabis
temporary event license.
Page 16 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(10) A regulated product temporary event license shall authorize the regulated product
event organizer to host events related to regulated products, subject to the
following restrictions:
(a) The location shall be designated on the application form to the department;
and
(b) The event shall comply with the requirements of any smoking ban that may
be enacted by a local government.
(11) The holder of a processor license, wholesaler license, or retail license may sell
and serve complimentary samples of regulated hemp products at fairs, festivals,
and other similar events in wet territory under the following circumstances:
(a) Sales by the drink;
(b) Sales by the package shall not exceed nine (9) liters per person, per day;
(c) Complimentary samples served shall not exceed one and three-fourths
(1.75) ounces per person, per day; and
(d) The regulated products shall have been lawfully produced or purchased by
the license holder.
(12) Subsection (11) of this section shall not apply to regulated kratom products or
industrial hemp products.
(13) A direct shipper license shall authorize the holder to ship regulated adult-use
products to consumers. A direct shipper license shall abide by the laws and
administrative regulations established in this chapter and Sections 15 and 16 of
this Act, except that:
(a) The direct shipper license shall be regulated by the department;
(b) A direct shipper licensee may sell or ship to a consumer all types of
cannabis-infused beverages that the licensee is authorized to sell, so long as
the quantities do not exceed ten (10) cases per customer per month;
(c) The department shall determine maximum quantities per customer per
Page 17 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
month for all other regulated adult-use products; and
(d) All regulated adult-use product containers shipped to the consumer shall be
conspicuously labeled with the words "ADULT USE ONLY: ID CHECK
OF PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY" for
each shipment.
(14) A processor license shall not hold a wholesaler license or retail license except as
defined in subsection (2) of this section.
(15) A wholesaler shall not hold a processor license or retail license.
(16) A retailer shall not hold a processor license or wholesaler license.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) All regulated product licenses and permits issued by the department shall be valid
for a period of no more than one (1) year. The department shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A establishing the
system for renewal of licenses.
(2) The renewal of any regulated product license or permit shall not be construed to
waive or condone any violation that occurred prior to the renewal and shall not
prevent subsequent proceedings against the licensee or permittee.
(3) The department may deny a license renewal if the licensee is a delinquent
taxpayer as defined in KRS 131.1815.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If the department denies a license or permit application, the commissioner shall
notify the applicant in writing of the denial and the reasons for the denial by
registered or certified mail at the address given in the application.
(2) The applicant may, within thirty (30) days after the date of the mailing of the
notice from the commissioner, file a request with the department for an
Page 18 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
administrative hearing on the application. The hearing shall be conducted by the
department as a de novo review of the application in compliance with KRS
Chapter 13B.
(3) If the commissioner denies an application and the applicant does not timely
request a department hearing on its application under subsection (2) of this
section, the department shall refund payment of any license or permit fee paid by
an applicant.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon proceedings for the revocation of any license or permit under this chapter,
the department may order a suspension of the license or permit. Subject to the
approval of the department, the licensee or permittee may pay, in lieu of part or
all of the days of any suspension period, a sum established in an administrative
regulation promulgated by the department. The department may suspend or
revoke a license for the reasons established in Section 17 of this Act.
(2) Payments in lieu of suspension collected by the department shall be deposited into
the Kentucky hemp fund established in Section 11 of this Act.
(3) Appeals from orders of suspension and the associated procedures shall be the
same as those provided for orders of revocation in KRS Chapter 13B.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Regulated adult-use products shall only be purchased, possessed, consumed, or
used by persons aged twenty-one (21) years or older, and a retail licensee shall
only sell to persons aged twenty-one (21) or older. This subsection shall not apply
to industrial hemp products and regulated products defined as nonintoxicating by
the department.
(2) A licensee under this chapter shall not sell, give, or provide regulated products to
Page 19 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
a person under the age of twenty-one (21).
(3) A person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not enter any premises licensed
for the sale of regulated adult-use products for the purpose of purchasing or
receiving any regulated adult-use products.
(4) A person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not misrepresent the person's
age for the purpose of inducing any licensee, or the licensee's agent or employee,
to sell any regulated adult-use products to the underage person.
(5) A person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not use or attempt to use any
false, fraudulent, or altered identification card, paper, or any other document to
purchase or attempt to purchase or otherwise obtain any regulated adult-use
products. A person who violates this section shall for the first offense be guilty of
a violation and, for the second and each subsequent offense, be guilty of a Class
B misdemeanor.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, any person who violates
subsections (3), (4), or (5) of this section shall be charged with a violation and
each violation shall constitute a separate offense.
(7) A violation of subsections (3), (4), or (5) of this section shall be deemed a status
offense if committed by a person under the age of eighteen (18) and shall be
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile session of the District Court or the family
division of the Circuit Court, as appropriate.
(8) It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge under subsection (2) of this section
that the sale was induced by the use of false, fraudulent, or altered identification
papers or other documents, and that the appearance and character of the
purchaser were such that the purchaser’s age could not have been ascertained by
any other means, and that the purchaser’s appearance and character indicated
strongly that the purchaser was of legal age to purchase regulated adult-use
products. This evidence may be introduced either in mitigation of the charge or
Page 20 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
as a defense to the charge itself.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department shall regulate products determined as having psychoactive effects
on consumers, except alcoholic beverages regulated by KRS Chapters 241 to 244
and tobacco, nicotine, and vapor products regulated by KRS Chapter 438.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Covered product" means any product identified by the department as
having intoxicating effects on consumers; and
(b) "Production" has the same meaning as in Section 23 of this Act.
(3) Not later than April 1, 2027, the department shall promulgate an emergency
administrative regulation with applicability to covered products that:
(a) Prohibits the sale, gift, or other transfer of possession of covered products to
a person who has not reached the age of twenty-one (21) years;
(b) Prohibits the possession of covered products by a person who has not
reached the age of twenty-one (21) years;
(c) Requires retailers to implement safety measures to prevent theft or easy
access by children;
(d) Establishes a laboratory testing and approval process for contaminants and
phytochemicals of a covered product;
(e) Requires covered products to be registered with and approved by the
department;
(f) Prohibits a covered product to be sold or distributed in the Commonwealth
unless it has been approved under paragraph (e) of this subsection;
(g) Prohibits the adulteration of covered products with additives that increase
toxicity or addictive potential, as determined by the department;
(h) Establishes milligram limits per serving;
Page 21 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(i) Establishes criteria for reviewing and approving novel psychoactive
substances to be permitted for sale in the Commonwealth, except that a
novel psychoactive substance shall not include kratom, kava, mushrooms,
blue lotus, and cannabinoids. The following cannabinoids are prohibited
from commerce without prior authorization from the department:
1. Hexahydrocannabinol (HHC);
2. Hexahyrdocannabiphorol (HHC-P);
3. Cannabinoid acetates;
4. Delta-10-Tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-10-THC);
5. Tetrahydrocannabiphorol (THCP);
6. Tetrahydrocannabioctyl (THC-JD);
7. 11-hydroxy-Tetrahydrocannabinol (11-OH-THC); and
8. Other cannabinoids determined by the department to be artificially
manufactured and that create an intoxicating effect and are not
naturally found in hemp;
(j) Requires each covered product manufactured, marketed, sold, or distributed
in the Commonwealth to be packaged and labeled in accordance with KRS
217.037;
(k) Except as established in paragraph (l) of this subsection, requires that a
covered product’s label include, in no less than four and one-half (4.5)
point font, the following information:
1. A statement of identity or common product name on the principal
display panel of the label;
2. The net quantity of contents expressed in both standard English and
metric units of measurement, located in the lower thirty percent (30%)
of the principal display panel of the label parallel to the base of the
container;
Page 22 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
3. The ingredients of the product, in descending order of predominance
by weight;
4. The name of the manufacturer or distributor;
5. If the covered product contains cannabinoids, the total amount of
each marketed cannabinoid per serving for ingestible products, or the
total amount per container for cosmetic products;
6. If the covered product is kratom, the total amount of mitragynine per
serving for ingestible products, or the total amount per container for
cosmetic products;
7. For any other covered product, the total amount of psychoactive
substance per serving for ingestible products, or the total amount per
container for cosmetic products;
8. Suggested use instructions or directions, including serving sizes; and
9. An expiration date, if any;
(l) Requires an ingestible or cosmetic covered product that has a total area of
twelve (12) square inches or less to bear labeling in accordance with
paragraph (k) of this subsection, except the print may be smaller than six
(6) point font but not less than one thirty-secondth (1/32) of an inch in
height;
(m) Requires each covered product container have a tamper evident seal;
(n) Prohibits covered product packaging, labeling, or advertising material from
bearing any implicit or explicit health claims stating that the covered
product can diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent any disease; and
(o) 1. Permits a Kentucky production facility that is shipping a covered
product to a state with testing requirements for the covered product to
defer to that state’s requirements.
2. Requires a Kentucky production facility that is shipping a covered
Page 23 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
product to a state without testing requirements for the covered product
to abide by Kentucky's requirements.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The manufacture, distribution, and retail sale of cannabis-infused
beverages by the drink and by the package shall be regulated solely by the
department.
(b) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish the rules and
procedures for the manufacture, distribution, and retail sale of cannabis-
infused beverages.
(c) The licensing for the manufacture, distribution and retail sale of cannabis
infused beverages may be equivalent to or supplemental to the processor,
wholesale, and retail licenses in Section 4 of this Act.
(d) The department shall establish administrative regulations that have similar
oversight to alcohol controls, including tied house laws, trade practice rules,
wholesale product rules, and payment terms.
(2) Cannabis-infused beverages shall only be available for retail sale by the package
or drink in wet territory by the holder of a:
(a) Cannabis-infused beverage retail license; or
(b) Processor license if the beverages were:
1. Produced by the processor;
2. Produced for the processor under a written contract with another
processor or manufacturer; or
3. Packaged for or by the processor.
(3) A person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not purchase or consume
cannabis-infused beverages. All restrictions and offenses related to minors and
Page 24 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
alcoholic beverages in KRS Chapters 241 to 244 shall also apply in the same
manner to minors and cannabis-infused beverages.
(4) A cannabis-infused beverage retail license shall authorize the licensee to sell
cannabis-infused beverages at retail at the licensed premises by the drink for
consumption on the premises only and by the package for consumption off the
licensed premises only. The licensee may purchase cannabis-infused beverages
from the holder of a:
(a) Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license; or
(b) Processor license as authorized by subsection (2) of Section 4 of this Act.
(5) A cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license may be issued to a qualifying
person as determined by the department. A cannabis-infused beverage
distributor's license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Purchase cannabis-infused beverages from:
1. A licensed cannabis-infused beverage manufacturer; and
2. Another holder of a cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license;
and
(b) Store cannabis-infused beverages and sell them from its licensed premises
to the holder of a:
1. Cannabis-infused beverage retail license; or
2. Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license.
(6) A cannabis-infused beverage distributor shall transport cannabis-infused
beverages only by a vehicle owned, rented, or leased and operated by the
cannabis-infused beverage distributor, which has affixed to its sides at all times a
sign of form and size prescribed by the department, containing among other
things the name and license number of the licensee.
(7) A cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license shall be obtained for each
separate warehouse, agent, distributor, broker, jobber, or place of business from
Page 25 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
which orders are received or cannabis-infused beverages are distributed.
(8) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license shall:
(a) Not hold a cannabis-infused beverage retail license; and
(b) Have a licensed location in Kentucky.
(9) A cannabis-infused beverage manufacturer may:
(a) Self-distribute cannabis-infused beverages; and
(b) Sell or ship to a cannabis-infused beverage distributor or to a consumer all
types of cannabis-infused beverages that the licensee is authorized to sell.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby created a trust and agency account to be known as the Kentucky
hemp fund. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Psychoactive
Substances.
(2) For tax periods beginning on or after January 1, 2027, one hundred percent
(100%) of the receipts collected under this section from any state retail regulatory
license fee and state wholesale regulatory license fee from the sale of hemp
products regulated by this chapter shall be deposited in the fund together with
any other money contributed, appropriated, or allocated to the fund from all
other sources. The fund may also receive additional state appropriations, gifts,
grants, and federal funds. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any money remaining in
the fund at the close of any calendar year shall not lapse but shall be carried
forward to the next calendar year.
(3) (a) The Department of Psychoactive Substances shall use moneys deposited in
the Kentucky hemp fund to administer the fund and provide rewards for the
industry to be divided as follows:
1. At least ninety percent (90%) shall be allocated to regulating,
researching, and promoting Kentucky’s hemp industry. The funds
Page 26 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
shall be allocated as follows:
a. One percent (1%) shall be allocated to:
i. Fund cannabis education, which shall be used to deter
underage consumption;
ii. Provide educational materials for adults to support the
prevention of underage consumption; and
iii. Establish a safe consumption training program for retailers
participating in on-premises sales;
b. Up to five percent (5%) shall be allocated to the Department for
Public Health’s laboratory to upgrade facilities for testing
cannabis;
c. Up to five percent (5%) shall be allocated to the Kentucky State
Police to establish a field sobriety test for cannabis;
d. Up to four percent (4%) shall be allocated to administer and
regulate hemp products, including maintaining state laboratory
cannabinoid testing facilities using fit-for-purpose
methodologies;
e. At least eighty percent (80%) shall be allocated to the University
of Kentucky Cannabis Center to advance the study of cannabis.
Of this money, at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the funds
allocated under this subdivision shall exclusively be allocated to
advance hemp feed animal trials for livestock and companion
animals until the department determines that funding is no
longer required for the hemp animal feed approval process, and
up to fifteen percent (15%) shall be allocated to the other
purposes of this subdivision. Once this hemp animal feed
funding is no longer required, all funding under this subdivision
Page 27 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
shall be allocated to the University of Kentucky Cannabis Center
for purposes that advance the study of cannabis; and
f. At least five percent (5%) shall be allocated to administer grants
related to innovations in and support of Kentucky hemp
agriculture, hemp agribusinesses and hemp agricultural
technology; and
2. Up to ten percent (10%) may be allocated for administration and
operation of Department of Psychoactive Substances, including costs
of department personnel, program administration, testing, and any
other costs incurred while conducting hemp programs authorized by
this chapter.
(b) The Department of Psychoactive Substances may promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A establishing the
conditions and criteria for the distribution of moneys from the fund.
(c) The Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A establishing the procedures necessary to
determine the correct allocation of sales tax receipts described in subsection
(1) of this section.
(d) Any funds remaining after upgrading the Department for Public Health’s
laboratory shall be directed to the UK Cannabis Center to advance the study
of cannabis.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Certified reference materials" means highly accurate, stable, and
homogenous substances with documented traceability to SI units, used to
evaluate methods and to ensure measurement quality;
Page 28 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(b) "Departments" means the Department for Public Health and the
Department of Psychoactive Substances;
(c) "Fit-for-purpose" means a validated test procedure that is suitable,
functional, and effective for its intended use and meets required standards;
(d) "Proficiency test" means a test established to evaluate the ability of a
laboratory to perform test procedures required under this section by
comparing each laboratory’s results against a set of standards;
(e) "Proficiency test sample" means an unknown substance sent by an
approved, external provider to a laboratory for analysis to evaluate
accuracy, precision, and performance. Proficiency test samples are
submitted blindly for testing using the same methods as are used for
regular, routine samples to assess the ability of the laboratory to produce
valid results; and
(f) "Third-party laboratory" means an independent, impartial testing entity not
affiliated with a manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or any other seller or
buyer of a hemp-derived cannabinoid product.
(2) The Department of Psychoactive Substances shall work with the Department for
Public Health to improve testing procedures, proficiency testing, and approvals of
third-party laboratories who seek to test registered hemp-derived cannabinoid
products for sale in Kentucky.
(3) Third-party laboratories certified to test registered hemp-derived cannabinoid
products shall meet the following requirements:
(a) Accreditation under ISO/IEC 17025:2017 standard by an ISO-certified
accreditation body, including accreditation for each method used for testing
hemp-derived cannabinoid products;
(b) Comprehensive quality systems and validated methods for testing hemp-
derived cannabinoids using both Gas Chromatography-Mass Spectrometry
Page 29 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(GC-MS/ or GC-MS/MS) and High-Performance Liquid Chromatography
(HPLC-PDA or LC-MS/MS) systems;
(c) Establishing standard operating procedures and methodologies for testing
products containing hemp-derived cannabinoids that are fit-for-purpose;
(d) Utilizing fit-for-purpose testing for plant material, oils, edibles, beverages,
and vaporizable products;
(e) Participating in an accredited proficiency testing program under ISO/IEC
17043; and
(f) Meeting other standards necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section.
(4) (a) The departments shall establish a proficiency test for demonstrating
proficiency in testing hemp-derived cannabinoids for the purpose of
evaluating and approving third-party laboratories that seek to conduct
compliance testing of hemp-derived cannabinoid products registered in the
Commonwealth.
(b) The Department of Psychoactive Substances shall collaborate with the
Department for Public Health to establish the proficiency test. The
departments shall utilize certified reference materials to create a reference
product for compliance testing. The reference product shall include the
following cannabinoids:
1. Cannabidiol (CBD) (CAS # 13956-29-1);
2. Cannabinol (CBN) (CAS # 521-35-7);
3. Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCA) (CAS # 23978-85-0);
4. Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9-THC) (CAS # 1972-08-3);
5. Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-8-THC) (CAS # 5757-75-5);
6. Hexahydrocannabinol (HHC) (CAS # 36403-90-4 for 9(R)-HHC and
36403-91-5 for 9(S)-HHC);
7. Delta-8-iso-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-8-iso-THC) (CAS # 23050-47-
Page 30 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
7);
8. Delta-4,8-iso-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta 4(8)-iso-THC) (CAS #
23050-59-1);
9. 9(R) Hexahydrocannabinol (9(R)-HHC) (CAS # 23050-47-7); and
10. 9(S) Hexahydrocannabinol (9(S)-HHC) (CAS # 36403-91-5).
(c) The proficiency test samples shall be of known concentration, preparation
documented, and maintained by the departments for purposes of proficiency
testing and periodic validation.
(5) Upon establishing the proficiency test, the departments shall establish an
approval process for third-party laboratories seeking to conduct testing of hemp-
derived cannabinoid products intended for registration in the Commonwealth in
accordance with the following:
(a) The departments shall provide proficiency test materials to any third-party
laboratory that seeks approval to conduct cannabinoid testing for hemp-
derived cannabinoid products intended for registration in Kentucky;
(b) Participating third-party laboratories shall test each proficiency sample
using the validated methods and analytical procedures that are within their
scope of accreditation as specified on their accreditation certificate and
submit their results to the Department for Public Health within a timeframe
established by the Department for Public Health;
(c) The Department for Public Health shall compare the proficiency test results
submitted by third-party laboratories to target values and to the results
derived from the same reference materials by other certified laboratories.
The results from each applicant laboratory for each analyte shall be
assigned a z-score;
(d) 1. A third-party laboratory shall be approved for inclusion on the
Commonwealth’s list of approved laboratories if its results fall within
Page 31 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
an acceptable range established by the Department of Psychoactive
Substances and Department for Public Health through the
promulgation of administrative regulations.
2. To be eligible for approval under this section, a third-party laboratory
shall maintain accreditation under ISO/IEC 17025:2017 or its
successor standard and shall provide proof of such accreditation to the
Department of Psychoactive Substances.
3. The Departmentof Psychoactive Substances may establish additional
requirements for third-party laboratories seeking approval within the
Commonwealth through an administrative regulation promulgated in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A; and
(e) The Department for Public Health shall create and maintain a publicly
available list of approved laboratories that meet requirements established
under this section.
(6) Upon establishment of the approved laboratory list:
(a) Any person or entity registering hemp-derived cannabinoid-containing
products in Kentucky shall utilize a laboratory included on the Department
for Public Health’s approved laboratory list; and
(b) All previously registered products containing cannabinoids shall be re-
registered with the Department of Psychoactive Substances to continue
selling in the Commonwealth. Any registration fees associated with this re-
registration requirement shall be waived.
(7) The Department of Psychoactive Substances shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement and enforce this
section, including but not limited to:
(a) Defining acceptable variance ranges for proficiency testing;
(b) Establishing timelines for laboratory participation and review;
Page 32 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(c) Establishing procedures for adding or removing laboratories from the
approved list;
(d) Specifying recordkeeping and reporting requirements; and
(e) Determining a timeframe for allowing registered businesses to re-register
products using the approved laboratories for retesting certified products to
assure conformance to hemp-derived cannabinoid standards.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The use of hemp-derived cannabinoid products shall be considered lawful if
done in accordance with:
1. This chapter and any administrative regulations promulgated
thereunder; and
2. Any administrative regulations promulgated by the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services, Cabinet for Public Protection, or the Kentucky
Department of Agriculture;
(b) The acquisition, blending, cultivation, delivery, distribution, manufacturing,
manipulation, packaging for sale, preparation, possession, sale, testing,
transportation, or transfer of hemp-derived cannabinoid products or hemp-
derived cannabinoid product accessories by a licensed business or licensed
business agent shall be considered lawful if done in accordance with this
chapter and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder;
(c) An attorney shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to
arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or
privilege, including but not limited to a civil penalty or disciplinary action
by the Kentucky Court of Justice, Kentucky Bar Association, or by any
Page 33 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
other professional licensing board, solely for providing an individual or
hemp-derived cannabinoid business with legal assistance related to activity
that is no longer subject to criminal penalties under state law pursuant to
this chapter; and
(d) A person shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to
arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or
privilege, including but not limited to a civil penalty or disciplinary action
by an occupational or professional licensing board, solely for providing
assistance or services, including but not limited to accounting services,
financial services, security services, or business consulting services, to any
individual or hemp-derived cannabinoid business related to activity that is
no longer subject to criminal penalties under state law pursuant to this
chapter.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed or interpreted to prohibit the
arrest, prosecution, or imposition of any other penalty arising from but not
limited to breach of contract, breach of fiduciary duty, negligence, or engaging in
criminal activity that would constitute a felony or misdemeanor.
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the Department of Psychoactive Substances fund. The fund shall
consist of amounts received from appropriations, and any other proceeds from
gifts, grants, federal funds, application fees, or license fees provided by Section 3
of this Act, civil penalties as provided by Section 17 of this Act, and any other
funds, both public and private, made available for purposes of this chapter,
except for any moneys allocated toward the Kentucky hemp fund established in
Section 11 of this Act.
Page 34 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(2) The Department of Psychoactive Substances fund shall be administered by the
department.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the costs of department
personnel, administrative expenses, and any other costs incurred while regulating
the activities authorized by this chapter.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the fund amounts not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
SECTION 15. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A direct shipper license issued under this chapter shall authorize the holder to
ship adult-use regulated products to consumers. The department shall issue a
direct shipper license to a successful applicant that:
(a) Pays the applicable annual license fee;
(b) Is a licensed adult-use regulated product manufacturer;
(c) Holds a current license, permit, or other authorization to manufacture or
supply adult-use regulated products in the state where the applicant is
located. If an applicant is located outside of Kentucky, proof of its current
license, permit, or other authorization as issued by its home state shall be
sufficient proof of its eligibility to hold a direct shipper license in Kentucky;
and
(d) Is an adult-use regulated products retailer licensed by the department.
(2) The department shall establish the form for a direct shipper license application
through the promulgation of an administrative regulation. These requirements
shall include only the following:
(a) The address of the manufacturer; and
(b) If the applicant is located outside this state, a copy of the applicant's current
license, permit, or other authorization to manufacture, store, or supply
Page 35 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
adult-use regulated products in the state where the applicant is located.
(3) For purposes of this section, the holder of a direct shipper license may utilize the
services of a third party to fulfill shipments, subject to the following:
(a) The third party shall not be required to hold any adult-use regulated
product license, but a licensed entity shall not serve as a third party to fulfill
shipments other than the holder of a transporter's license;
(b) The third party may operate from the premises of the direct shipper licensee
or from another business location; and
(c) The direct shipper licensee shall be liable for any violation of this chapter
and its accompanying administrative regulations that may occur by the
third party.
(4) A direct shipper licensee shall:
(a) Agree that the Secretary of State shall serve as its registered agent for
service of process. The licensee shall agree that legal service on the agent
constitutes legal service on the direct shipper licensee;
(b) Maintain the records required by the department and provide the
department and the Department of Revenue access to or copies of these
records;
(c) Allow the department or the Department of Revenue to perform an audit of
the direct shipper licensee's records or an inspection of the direct shipper
licensee's licensed premises upon request. If an audit or inspection reveals a
violation, the department or the Department of Revenue may recover
reasonable expenses from the licensee for the cost of the audit or
inspection;
(d) Register with the Department of Revenue, and file all reports and pay all
taxes required under this chapter; and
(e) Submit to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any
Page 36 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
violation of this chapter or its accompanying administrative regulations or
for nonpayment of any taxes owed.
(5) (a) Each direct shipper licensee shall submit to the department and the
Department of Revenue a quarterly report for that direct shipper license
showing:
1. The total amount of adult-use regulated products shipped into the
state per consumer;
2. The name and address of each consumer;
3. The purchase price of the adult-use regulated products shipped and
the amount of taxes charged to the consumer for the adult-use
regulated products shipped; and
4. The name and address of each common carrier.
(b) The Department of Revenue shall create a form through the promulgation
of an administrative regulation for reporting under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) The department shall provide a list of all active direct shipper licensees to
licensed common carriers on a quarterly basis to reduce the number of
unlicensed shipments in the Commonwealth.
(6) A direct shipper licensee shall submit a current copy of its adult-use regulated
products license from its home state along with the applicable license fee every
year upon renewal of its direct shipper license.
SECTION 16. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A direct shipper licensee may sell or ship to a consumer all types of adult-use
regulated products that the licensee is authorized to sell, with an aggregate limit
not to exceed ten (10) cases per customer per month.
(2) The direct shipper licensee shall notify the consumer placing the order that the
Page 37 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
shipment shall not be left unless the recipient of the shipment provides a valid
identification document at the time verifying that the recipient is at least twenty-
one (21) years of age. All adult-use regulated product containers shipped to the
consumer shall be conspicuously labeled with the words "CONTAINS ADULT-
USE REGULATED PRODUCTS: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR
OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY" for each shipment.
(3) At the time of delivery, the recipient of the shipment shall present to the
individual delivering the package a valid identification document. Prior to
transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the package
shall visually inspect the document and verify the identity of the recipient and, by
visual examination or by using age verification technology, that the recipient is at
least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(4) Before transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the
package shall obtain the signature of the recipient of the shipment. The
individual who receives and signs for the adult-use regulated products is not
required to be the consumer who purchased the adult-use regulated products.
(5) A consumer who intentionally causes shipment to an address deemed unlawful
shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of two
hundred fifty dollars ($250), and for each subsequent offense, be guilty of a
violation punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500). In this instance, the
direct shipper licensee and the common carrier shall be held harmless.
(6) A direct shipper licensee may not sell or ship adult-use regulated products to a
consumer from its licensed premises if the consumer's address is located in an
area in which that type of adult-use regulated products may not be sold or
received.
(7) Shipments made pursuant to this section shall be made through a common
carrier.
Page 38 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(8) If a common carrier is unable to complete delivery, then the adult-use regulated
products shall be returned to the consignor.
SECTION 17. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 239 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department may temporarily suspend a license up to sixty (60) days if the
licensee is alleged to have:
(a) Violated any provision of this chapter or an administrative regulation
promulgated under the authority of this chapter;
(b) Made any false statement to the department or its representatives;
(c) Pled guilty to, or been convicted of, any felony or drug-related misdemeanor
or violation;
(d) Failed to comply with only those instructions agreed upon in the contract
signed by the licensee at the time a license was issued; or
(e) Failed to comply with an order from a representative of the department,
representative of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or any law
enforcement officer.
(2) The department may temporarily suspend a license up to sixty (60) days without
giving the licensee advance notice of the charge against him or her or an
opportunity to be heard.
(3) The department shall not permanently revoke a license until the department has
notified the licensee of the charge against him or her and given the licensee an
opportunity for a hearing before a three (3) person panel whose members have
been designated by the Commissioner. The three (3) person panel shall include:
(a) Two (2) members who are employees of the department; and
(b) One (1) member who is not an employee of the department.
(4) The department may permanently revoke a license if the licensee admits, or is
found in a hearing, to have:
Page 39 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(a) Violated any provision of this chapter or an administrative regulation
promulgated under the authority of this chapter;
(b) Made any false statement to the department or its representative;
(c) Pled guilty to, or been convicted of, any felony or drug-related misdemeanor
or violation; or
(d) Failed to comply with any instruction or order from the department, a
representative of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or any law
enforcement officer.
(5) The department may impose a monetary civil penalty, not to exceed two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation, on any person who violates this
chapter or an administrative regulation promulgated under the authority of this
chapter.
(6) The department shall not impose a monetary civil penalty against a person
alleged to have violated this chapter, or an administrative regulation promulgated
under the authority of this chapter, until the department has notified the person
of the charge against him or her and given the person the opportunity for a
hearing before the three (3) person panel.
Section 18. KRS 2.015 is amended to read as follows:
Persons of the age of eighteen (18) years are of the age of majority for all purposes in this
Commonwealth except for the purchase of alcoholic beverages, purchase of adult-use
products regulated by KRS Chapter 239, and for purposes of care and treatment of
children with disabilities, for which twenty-one (21) years is the age of majority, all other
statutes to the contrary notwithstanding.
Section 19. KRS 12.020 is amended to read as follows:
Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major
administrative bodies that they include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended
that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-inclusive. Every authority, board,
Page 40 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any
other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program
cabinet in which they are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily
authorized executive order; except in the case of the Personnel Board and where the
attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected
officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and
coordination of activities and shall not include any authority over the functions,
personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the department or administrative
body.
I. Cabinet for General Government - Departments headed by elected officers:
(1) The Governor.
(2) Lieutenant Governor.
(3) Department of State.
(a) Secretary of State.
(b) Board of Elections.
(c) Registry of Election Finance.
(4) Department of Law.
(a) Attorney General.
(5) Department of the Treasury.
(a) Treasurer.
(6) Department of Agriculture.
(a) Commissioner of Agriculture.
(b) Agricultural Development Board.
(c) Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.
(7) Auditor of Public Accounts.
(a) Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman.
II. Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:
Page 41 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(1) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:
(a) Department of Kentucky State Police.
1. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Operational Support.
b. Division of Management Services.
2. Office of Operations.
a. Division of West Troops.
b. Division of East Troops.
c. Division of Special Enforcement.
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.
3. Office of Technical Services.
a. Division of Forensic Sciences.
b. Division of Electronic Services.
c. Division of Records Management.
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training.
(c) Department of Corrections.
(d) Department of Juvenile Justice.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
(f) Office of Drug Control Policy.
(g) Office of Legal Services.
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.
(i) Parole Board.
(j) Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(k) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.
(l) Office of Human Resource Management.
1. Division of Human Resource Administration.
2. Division of Employee Management.
Page 42 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(m) Department of Public Advocacy.
(n) Office of Communications.
1. Information Technology Services Division.
(o) Office of Financial Management Services.
1. Division of Financial Management.
(p) Grants Management Division.
(2) Energy and Environment Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Legal Division I.
b. Legal Division II.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Communication.
5. Mine Safety Review Commission.
6. Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.
7. Kentucky Public Service Commission.
(b) Department for Environmental Protection.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division for Air Quality.
3. Division of Water.
4. Division of Environmental Program Support.
5. Division of Waste Management.
6. Division of Enforcement.
7. Division of Compliance Assistance.
(c) Department for Natural Resources.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
Page 43 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
2. Division of Mine Permits.
3. Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.
4. Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.
5. Division of Oil and Gas.
6. Division of Mine Safety.
7. Division of Forestry.
8. Division of Conservation.
9. Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.
(d) Office of Energy Policy.
1. Division of Energy Assistance.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
1. Division of Human Resources Management.
2. Division of Financial Management.
3. Division of Information Services.
(3) Public Protection Cabinet.
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Communications and Public Outreach.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Insurance Legal Division.
b. Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.
c. Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.
d. Financial Institutions Legal Division.
e. Professional Licensing Legal Division.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources.
b. Division of Fiscal Responsibility.
Page 44 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(b) Office of Claims and Appeals.
1. Board of Tax Appeals.
2. Board of Claims.
3. Crime Victims Compensation Board.
(c) Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.
(d) Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.
1. Division of Distilled Spirits.
2. Division of Malt Beverages.
3. Division of Enforcement.
4. Division of Tobacco, Nicotine, and Vapor Product Licensing.
(e) Department of Financial Institutions.
1. Division of Depository Institutions.
2. Division of Non-Depository Institutions.
3. Division of Securities.
(f) Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
1. Division of Fire Prevention.
2. Division of Plumbing.
3. Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.
4. Division of Building Code Enforcement.
(g) Department of Insurance.
1. Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.
2. Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.
3. Division of Administrative Services.
4. Division of Financial Standards and Examination.
5. Division of Licensing.
6. Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.
7. Division of Consumer Protection.
Page 45 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(h) Department of Professional Licensing.
1. Real Estate Authority.
2. Division of Real Property Boards.
(i) Department of Psychoactive Substances.
1. Division of Hemp.
2. Division of Kratom.
(4) Transportation Cabinet:
(a) Department of Highways.
1. Office of Project Development.
2. Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.
3. Office of Highway Safety.
4. Highway District Offices One through Twelve.
(b) Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(c) Department of Aviation.
(d) Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.
1. Office of Local Programs.
2. Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.
3. Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.
4. Office of Inspector General.
5. Secretary's Office of Safety.
(f) Office of Support Services.
(g) Office of Transportation Delivery.
(h) Office of Audits.
(i) Office of Human Resource Management.
Page 46 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(j) Office of Information Technology.
(k) Office of Legal Services.
(5) Cabinet for Economic Development:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
2. Department for Business and Community Development.
a. Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky.
b. Development, Retention, and Administrative Division –
Central and East Kentucky.
c. Community and Workforce Development Division.
3. Department for Financial Services.
a. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
b. Finance and Personnel Division.
c. IT and Resource Management Division.
d. Compliance Division.
e. Program Administration Division.
f. Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.
g. The GRANT Commission.
4. Office of Strategy and Public Affairs.
a. Marketing and Communications Division.
b. Research and Strategy Division.
5. Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
a. Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.
6. Kentucky Film Office.
a. Kentucky Film Leadership Council.
(6) Cabinet for Health and Family Services:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
Page 47 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
3. Office of Inspector General.
4. Office of Human Resource Management.
5. Office of Finance and Budget.
6. Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.
7. Office of Administrative Services.
8. Office of Application Technology Services.
9. Office of Data Analytics.
10. Office of Medical Cannabis.
a. Division of Enforcement and Compliance.
b. Division of Licensure and Access.
(b) Department for Public Health.
(c) Department for Medicaid Services.
(d) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual
Disabilities.
(e) Department for Aging and Independent Living.
(f) Department for Community Based Services.
(g) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.
(7) Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Office of the Inspector General.
(c) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
(d) Office of General Counsel.
(e) Office of the Controller.
(f) Office of Administrative Services.
(g) Office of Policy and Audit.
Page 48 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(h) Department for Facilities and Support Services.
(i) Department of Revenue.
(j) Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(k) State Property and Buildings Commission.
(l) Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.
(m) Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.
(n) Commonwealth Credit Union.
(o) State Investment Commission.
(p) Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(q) Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(r) Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(s) Historic Properties Advisory Commission.
(t) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(u) Kentucky River Authority.
(v) Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees.
(w) Executive Branch Ethics Commission.
(x) Office of Fleet Management.
(8) Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:
(a) Kentucky Department of Tourism.
1. Division of Tourism Services.
2. Division of Marketing and Administration.
3. Division of Communications and Promotions.
(b) Kentucky Department of Parks.
1. Division of Information Technology.
2. Division of Human Resources.
3. Division of Financial Operations.
4. Division of Purchasing.
Page 49 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
5. Division of Facilities.
6. Division of Park Operations.
7. Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.
8. Division of Engagement.
9. Division of Food Services.
10. Division of Rangers.
(c) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
1. Division of Law Enforcement.
2. Division of Administrative Services.
3. Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.
4. Division of Fisheries.
5. Division of Information and Education.
6. Division of Wildlife.
7. Division of Marketing.
(d) Kentucky Horse Park.
1. Division of Support Services.
2. Division of Buildings and Grounds.
3. Division of Operational Services.
(e) Kentucky State Fair Board.
1. Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.
2. Office of Human Resources and Access Control.
3. Division of Expositions.
4. Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.
5. Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.
6. Division of Public Relations and Media.
7. Division of Venue Services.
8. Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.
Page 50 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
9. Division of Sales.
10. Division of Security and Traffic Control.
11. Division of Information Technology.
12. Division of the Louisville Arena.
13. Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.
14. Division of Access Control.
(f) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Finance.
2. Office of Government Relations and Administration.
(g) Office of Legal Affairs.
(h) Office of Human Resources.
(i) Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.
(j) Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.
(k) Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.
(l) Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.
(m) Kentucky Humanities Council.
(n) Kentucky Heritage Council.
(o) Kentucky Arts Council.
(p) Kentucky Historical Society.
1. Division of Museums.
2. Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.
3. Division of Research and Publications.
4. Division of Administration.
(q) Kentucky Center for the Arts.
1. Division of Governor's School for the Arts.
(r) Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.
(s) Northern Kentucky Convention Center.
Page 51 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(t) Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.
(9) Personnel Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration.
(c) Office of Employee Relations.
(d) Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
(f) Office of Legal Services.
(g) Governmental Services Center.
(h) Department of Employee Insurance.
(i) Office of Diversity, Equality, and Training.
(j) Office of Public Affairs.
(10) Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
a. Workplace Standards Legal Division.
b. Workers' Claims Legal Division.
c. Workforce Development Legal Division.
2. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources Management.
b. Division of Fiscal Management.
c. Division of Operations and Support Services.
3. Office of Technology Services.
a. Division of Information Technology Services.
4. Office of Policy and Audit.
5. Office of Legislative Services.
6. Office of Communications.
Page 52 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
7. Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
8. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
9. Early Childhood Advisory Council.
10. Governors' Scholars Program.
11. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program.
12. Foundation for Adult Education.
(b) Department of Education.
1. Kentucky Board of Education.
2. Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.
3. Education Professional Standards Board.
(c) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.
(d) Department for Libraries and Archives.
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council.
(f) Kentucky Educational Television.
(g) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(h) Department of Workforce Development.
1. Career Development Office.
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.
a. Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.
b. Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.
c. Division of Blind Services.
d. Division of Field Services.
e. Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.
f. Employment First Council.
g. Division of Program Policy and Support.
3. Office of Industry and Apprenticeship Services.
a. Division of Apprenticeship.
Page 53 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
b. Division of Workforce Talent.
4. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.
5. Division of Technical Assistance.
6. Office of Adult Education.
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(i) Department of Workplace Standards.
1. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.
2. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and
Training.
3. Division of Wages and Hours.
(j) Office of Unemployment Insurance.
(k) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.
(l) Department of Workers' Claims.
1. Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
2. Office of Administrative Law Judges.
3. Division of Claims Processing.
4. Division of Security and Compliance.
5. Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
6. Workers' Compensation Board.
(m) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission.
(n) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.
(o) State Labor Relations Board.
(p) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority.
(q) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.
(r) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee.
(s) Office of Educational Programs.
(t) Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
Page 54 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(u) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.
(v) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.
(w) Kentucky Geographic Education Board.
(x) Department for Disability Determination Services.
1. Division of Operations.
2. Division of Support Services.
3. Division of Specialized Cases.
4. Division of Case Processing.
III. Other departments headed by appointed officers:
(1) Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) Department of Military Affairs.
(3) Department for Local Government.
(4) Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.
(5) Kentucky Commission on Women.
(6) Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(7) Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.
(8) Office of Minority Empowerment.
(9) Governor's Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.
(10) Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
Section 20. KRS 12.252 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is established within the Public Protection Cabinet a Department of Financial
Institutions, a Department of Insurance, a Department of Housing, Buildings and
Construction, a Department of Professional Licensing, a Department of
Psychoactive Substances, and a Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control. Each
department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor as
required by KRS 12.040 and, where appropriate, by KRS 241.015 and 304.2-020.
Commissioners shall be directly responsible to the secretary and shall perform the
Page 55 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
functions, powers, and duties provided by law and prescribed by the secretary.
(2) The secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet shall be appointed by the Governor
in accordance with KRS 12.255. The Office of the Secretary shall contain the
following entities:
(a) The Office of Communications and Public Outreach, which shall be headed
by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050;
(b) The Office of Legal Services, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance
with KRS 12.050 and 12.210;
(c) The Office of Administrative Hearings, which shall be headed by an executive
director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in
accordance with KRS 12.050 and 12.210; and
(d) The Office of Administrative Services, which shall be headed by an executive
director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in
accordance with KRS 12.050.
(3) There is established within the Public Protection Cabinet the Office of Claims and
Appeals pursuant to KRS 49.010.
(4) There is established within the Public Protection Cabinet the Kentucky Boxing and
Wrestling Commission, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed
by the secretary with the approval of the Governor as required by KRS 12.050. The
executive director shall be directly responsible to the secretary and shall perform
the functions, powers, and duties provided by law and prescribed by the secretary.
Section 21. KRS 138.870 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 138.870 to 138.889, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Controlled substance" means any controlled substance, whether real or counterfeit,
as defined in KRS 218A.010 or any regulation promulgated thereunder, except that
Page 56 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
it shall not include marijuana, hemp-derived cannabinoid products as defined in
Section 1 of this Act, or medicinal cannabis;
(2) "Dosage unit" means a tablet, capsule, vial, or ampule of a controlled substance or,
in cases of mass volume or diluted quantities, the proper dose or quantity of a
controlled substance to be taken all at one (1) time or in fractional amounts within a
given period, as defined and adopted by the United States Pharmacopeia;
(3) "Marijuana":
(a) Means marijuana, whether real or counterfeit, as defined in KRS 218A.010;[
and]
(b) Does not include medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010; and
(c) Does not include hemp-derived cannabinoid products as defined in Section
1 of this Act;
(4) "Offender" means a person who engages in this state in a taxable activity as defined
in subsection (6) of this section;
(5) "Possessing" includes either actual possession or constructive possession, or a
combination of both actual and constructive possession. Mere possession or
ownership of real estate or an interest therein does not establish constructive
possession; and
(6) "Taxable activity" means producing, cultivating, manufacturing, importing,
transporting, distributing, acquiring, purchasing, storing, selling, using, or otherwise
possessing, in violation of KRS Chapter 218A, more than five (5) marijuana plants
with foliation, 42.5 grams of marijuana which has been detached from the plant on
which it grew, seven (7) grams of any controlled substance, or fifty (50) or more
dosage units of any controlled substance which is not sold by weight. The weight or
dosage units in this subsection shall include the weight of marijuana or the weight
or dosage units of the controlled substance, whether pure, impure, or diluted. A
quantity of a controlled substance is diluted if it consists of a detectable quantity of
Page 57 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
a pure controlled substance and any excipients or fillers.
Section 22. KRS 217.039 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cannabidiol" means a non-psychoactive cannabinoid found in the hemp
plant Cannabis sativa which has the chemical name 2-[(1R,6R)-3-methyl-6-
prop-1-en-2-ylcyclohex-2-en-1-yl]-5-pentylbenzene-1,3-diol;
(b) "Certificate of analysis" means a document produced by a laboratory that has
been accredited pursuant to standards of the International Organization for
Standardization, attesting to the composition of a product. The certificate of
analysis shall include but not be limited to the amount of:
1. Delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol;
2. Tetrahydrocannabinolic-acid;
3. [, the amount of ]Other cannabinoids;
4. [, the amount of ]Pesticide residues;
5. [, the amount of ]Heavy metal traces;
6. [, the amount of ]Mycotoxin contaminants;
7. [, the amount of ]Residual solvents;[,] and
8. [the amount of ]Microbiological contaminants;
(c) "Hemp" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act[KRS 260.850]; and
(d) "Quick response code" or "QR code" means a type of machine-readable, two
(2) dimensional bar code that stores information about a product.
(2) A manufacturer or processor of hemp-derived cannabinoid[ingestible or cosmetic
cannabidiol] products located in Kentucky shall:
(a) Be permitted[ as a food manufacturer or a cosmetic manufacturer] by the
Department of Psychoactive Substances[cabinet] and shall provide the
following information:
1. The name of the manufacturer or processor and the physical address
Page 58 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
where production or processing occurs; and
2. A listing of the hemp-derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] products to be
produced or processed; and
(b) Obtain a certificate of analysis for all hemp-derived
cannabinoid[cannabidiol] products to be sold or otherwise distributed in the
Commonwealth.
(3) All ingestible or cosmetic hemp-derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] products sold or
otherwise distributed in the Commonwealth shall bear labeling to allow the
consumer to access information on the product, including a certificate of analysis
for the product[, the location where the hemp was grown,] and the address and
phone number of the manufacturer or distributor using the following:
(a) A scannable bar code, including the batch number or serial number of the
product;
(b) A QR code; or
(c) A web address linked to a document or website.
(4) Any product labeling or advertising material for any ingestible or cosmetic hemp-
derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] product sold or otherwise distributed in the
Commonwealth shall not bear any claims stating that the product can diagnose,
treat, cure, or prevent any disease.
(5) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish labeling requirements for ingestible or cosmetic hemp-
derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] products in accordance with of this section.
(6) On and after the effective date of this Act, the Department of Psychoactive
Substances[(a) the cabinet] shall solely regulate and license the
manufacture, distribution, and retail sale[manufacturers] of cannabis-infused
beverages[.
(b) After the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control has promulgated
Page 59 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
administrative regulations under KRS 243.401 or July 1, 2026, whichever is
earlier, this section shall not apply to any distributor or retailer of cannabis-
infused beverages licensed under KRS Chapters 241 to 244. The distribution
and retail sale of cannabis-infused beverages shall then be regulated solely by
the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control under KRS Chapter 243 and
the administrative regulations promulgated thereto].
Section 23. KRS 218A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or
research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or by his or her authorized agent under his or her immediate
supervision and pursuant to his or her order; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the
practitioner;
(2) "Anabolic steroid" means any drug or hormonal substance chemically and
pharmacologically related to testosterone that promotes muscle growth and includes
those substances classified as Schedule III controlled substances pursuant to KRS
218A.020 but does not include estrogens, progestins, and anticosteroids;
(3) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(4) "Carfentanil" means any substance containing any quantity of carfentanil, or any of
its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(5) "Certified community based palliative care program" means a palliative care
program which has received certification from the Joint Commission;
(6) "Child" means any person under the age of majority as specified in KRS 2.015;
(7) "Cocaine" means a substance containing any quantity of cocaine, its salts, optical
and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
Page 60 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(8) "Controlled substance" means methamphetamine, or a drug, substance, or
immediate precursor in Schedules I through V and includes a controlled substance
analogue;
(9) (a) "Controlled substance analogue," except as provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, means a substance:
1. The chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; and
2. Which has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; or
3. With respect to a particular person, which such person represents or
intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II.
(b) Such term does not include:
1. Any substance for which there is an approved new drug application;
2. With respect to a particular person, any substance if an exemption is in
effect for investigational use for that person pursuant to federal law to
the extent conduct with respect to such substance is pursuant to such
exemption; or
3. Any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before
the exemption described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph takes
effect with respect to that substance;
(10) "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance which, or the container or
labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other
Page 61 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
identifying mark, imprint, number, or device, or any likeness thereof, of a
manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other than the person who in fact
manufactured, distributed, or dispensed the substance;
(11) "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research
subject by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the packaging,
labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery;
(12) "Dispenser" means a person who lawfully dispenses a Schedule II, III, IV, or V
controlled substance to or for the use of an ultimate user;
(13) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled
substance;
(14) "Dosage unit" means a single pill, capsule, ampule, liquid, or other form of
administration available as a single unit;
(15) "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia,
official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National
Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, care, mitigation, treatment, or
prevention of disease in man or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of
the body of man or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in this
subsection.
It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories;
(16) "Fentanyl" means a substance containing any quantity of fentanyl, or any of its
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(17) "Fentanyl derivative" means a substance containing any quantity of any chemical
compound, except compounds specifically scheduled as controlled substances by
Page 62 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
statute or by administrative regulation pursuant to this chapter, which is structurally
derived from 1-ethyl-4-(N-phenylamido) piperadine:
(a) By substitution:
1. At the 2-position of the 1-ethyl group with a phenyl, furan, thiophene, or
ethyloxotetrazole ring system; and
2. Of the terminal amido hydrogen atom with an alkyl, alkoxy, cycloalkyl,
or furanyl group; and
(b) Which may be further modified in one (1) or more of the following ways:
1. By substitution on the N-phenyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy,
haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents;
2. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with alkyl, allyl,
alkoxy, hydroxy, or halide substituents at the 2-, 3-, 5-, and/or 6-
positions;
3. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with a phenyl,
alkoxy, or carboxylate ester substituent at the 4- position; or
4. By substitution on the 1-ethyl group to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, or
hydroxy substituents;
(18) "Good-faith prior examination," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal
prosecution only, means an in-person medical examination of the patient conducted
by the prescribing practitioner or other health-care professional routinely relied
upon in the ordinary course of his or her practice, at which time the patient is
physically examined and a medical history of the patient is obtained. "In-person"
includes telehealth examinations. This subsection shall not be applicable to hospice
providers licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B;
(19) "Hazardous chemical substance" includes any chemical substance used or intended
for use in the illegal manufacture of a controlled substance as defined in this section
or the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine as defined in KRS 218A.1431,
Page 63 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
which:
(a) Poses an explosion hazard;
(b) Poses a fire hazard; or
(c) Is poisonous or injurious if handled, swallowed, or inhaled;
(20) "Heroin" means a substance containing any quantity of heroin, or any of its salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers;
(21) "Hydrocodone combination product" means a drug with:
(a) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of
its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15)
milligrams per dosage unit, with a fourfold or greater quantity of an
isoquinoline alkaloid of opium; or
(b) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of
its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15)
milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(22) "Immediate precursor" means a substance which is the principal compound
commonly used or produced primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical
intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance
or methamphetamine, the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
manufacture;
(23) "Industrial hemp" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act[KRS 260.850];
(24) "Industrial hemp products" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act[KRS
260.850];
(25) "Intent to manufacture" means any evidence which demonstrates a person's
conscious objective to manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine.
Such evidence includes but is not limited to statements and a chemical substance's
usage, quantity, manner of storage, or proximity to other chemical substances or
Page 64 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
equipment used to manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine;
(26) "Isomer" means the optical isomer, except the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services may include the optical, positional, or geometric isomer to classify any
substance pursuant to KRS 218A.020;
(27) "Manufacture," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means the production,
preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled
substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural
origin or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of
the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container except that this term does not
include activities:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to his or her administering or dispensing of a
controlled substance in the course of his or her professional practice;
(b) By a practitioner, or by his or her authorized agent under his supervision, for
the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis
and not for sale; or
(c) By a pharmacist as an incident to his or her dispensing of a controlled
substance in the course of his or her professional practice;
(28) "Marijuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis sp., whether growing or not; the
seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin
or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of these
substances. The term "marijuana" does not include:
(a) [Industrial ]Hemp that is in the possession, custody, or control of a person
who holds a license issued by the Department of Agriculture permitting that
person to cultivate[,]or handle[, or process industrial] hemp;
(b) Hemp that is in the possession, custody, or control of a person who holds a
Page 65 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
license issued by the Department of Psychoactive Substances permitting that
person to handle or process hemp;
(c) [Industrial ]Hemp products that do not include any living plants, viable seeds,
leaf materials, or floral materials;
(d)[(c)] Hemp-derived cannabinoids[The substance cannabidiol], when
transferred, dispensed, or administered pursuant to the written order of a
physician practicing at a hospital or associated clinic affiliated with a
Kentucky public university having a college or school of medicine;
(e)[(d)] For persons participating in a clinical trial or in an expanded access
program, a drug or substance approved for the use of those participants by the
United States Food and Drug Administration;
(f)[(e)] A hemp-derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] product[ derived from
industrial hemp,] as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS 260.850];
(g)[(f)] For the purpose of conducting scientific research, a cannabinoid product
derived from[ industrial] hemp, as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS
260.850];
(h)[(g)] A cannabinoid product approved as a prescription medication by the
United States Food and Drug Administration;[ or]
(i)[(h)] Medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010; or
(j) Products regulated under KRS Chapter 239;
(29) "Medical history," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only,
means an accounting of a patient's medical background, including but not limited to
prior medical conditions, prescriptions, and family background;
(30) "Medical order," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only,
means a lawful order of a specifically identified practitioner for a specifically
identified patient for the patient's health-care needs. "Medical order" may or may
not include a prescription drug order;
Page 66 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(31) "Medical record," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only,
means a record, other than for financial or billing purposes, relating to a patient,
kept by a practitioner as a result of the practitioner-patient relationship;
(32) "Methamphetamine" means any substance that contains any quantity of
methamphetamine, or any of its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(33) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly
by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of
chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(a) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of
opium or opiate;
(b) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is
chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids
of opium;
(c) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
(d) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been
removed;
(e) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
(f) Ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; and
(g) Any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of any of
the substances referred to in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection;
(34) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having
addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. It does not include, unless
specifically designated as controlled under KRS 218A.020, the dextrorotatory
isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). It does
Page 67 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
include its racemic and levorotatory forms;
(35) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species papaver somniferum L., except its
seeds;
(36) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision
or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal
entity;
(37) "Physical injury" has the same meaning it has in KRS 500.080;
(38) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing;
(39) "Pharmacist" means a natural person licensed by this state to engage in the practice
of the profession of pharmacy;
(40) "Practitioner" means a physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, scientific
investigator, optometrist as authorized in KRS 320.240, advanced practice
registered nurse as authorized under KRS 314.011, physician assistant as authorized
under KRS 311.858, or other person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted by
state or federal law to acquire, distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to,
or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or
research in this state. "Practitioner" also includes a physician, dentist, podiatrist,
veterinarian, or advanced practice registered nurse authorized under KRS 314.011
who is a resident of and actively practicing in a state other than Kentucky and who
is licensed and has prescriptive authority for controlled substances under the
professional licensing laws of another state, unless the person's Kentucky license
has been revoked, suspended, restricted, or probated, in which case the terms of the
Kentucky license shall prevail;
(41) "Practitioner-patient relationship," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal
prosecution only, means a medical relationship that exists between a patient and a
practitioner or the practitioner's designee, after the practitioner or his or her
designee has conducted at least one (1) good-faith prior examination;
Page 68 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(42) "Prescription" means a written, electronic, or oral order for a drug or medicine, or
combination or mixture of drugs or medicines, or proprietary preparation, signed or
given or authorized by a medical, dental, chiropody, veterinarian, optometric
practitioner, or advanced practice registered nurse, and intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other
animals;
(43) "Prescription blank," with reference to a controlled substance, means a document
that meets the requirements of KRS 218A.204 and 217.216;
(44) "Presumptive probation" means a sentence of probation not to exceed the maximum
term specified for the offense, subject to conditions otherwise authorized by law,
that is presumed to be the appropriate sentence for certain offenses designated in
this chapter, notwithstanding contrary provisions of KRS Chapter 533. That
presumption shall only be overcome by a finding on the record by the sentencing
court of substantial and compelling reasons why the defendant cannot be safely and
effectively supervised in the community, is not amenable to community-based
treatment, or poses a significant risk to public safety;
(45) "Production" includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing, or harvesting
of a controlled substance;
(46) "Recovery program" means an evidence-based, nonclinical service that assists
individuals and families working toward sustained recovery from substance use and
other criminal risk factors. This can be done through an array of support programs
and services that are delivered through residential and nonresidential means;
(47) "Salvia" means Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A and includes all parts of the plant
presently classified botanically as Salvia divinorum, whether growing or not, the
seeds thereof, any extract from any part of that plant, and every compound,
manufacture, derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant, its seeds, or its
extracts, including salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of
Page 69 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation of that plant, its seeds, or extracts. The term shall not include any other
species in the genus salvia;
(48) "Second or subsequent offense" means that for the purposes of this chapter an
offense is considered as a second or subsequent offense, if, prior to his or her
conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted under this
chapter, or under any statute of the United States, or of any state relating to
substances classified as controlled substances or counterfeit substances, except that
a prior conviction for a nontrafficking offense shall be treated as a prior offense
only when the subsequent offense is a nontrafficking offense. For the purposes of
this section, a conviction voided under KRS 218A.275 or 218A.276 shall not
constitute a conviction under this chapter;
(49) "Sell" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person for
consideration or in furtherance of commercial distribution;
(50) "Serious physical injury" has the same meaning it has in KRS 500.080;
(51) "Synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines" means any chemical compound which is
not approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved,
which is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law, that
contains Benzylpiperazine (BZP); Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine (TFMPP); 1,1-
Dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxytetrahydrocannabinol (HU-210); 1-Butyl-3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole; 1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; dexanabinol (HU-211); or any
compound in the following structural classes:
(a) Naphthoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
Page 70 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but
are not limited to JWH-015, JWH-018, JWH-019, JWH-073, JWH-081, JWH-
122, JWH-200, and AM-2201;
(b) Phenylacetylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-phenylacetylindole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are
not limited to JWH-167, JWH-250, JWH-251, and RCS-8;
(c) Benzoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole structure with
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are
not limited to AM-630, AM-2233, AM-694, Pravadoline (WIN 48,098), and
RCS-4;
(d) Cyclohexylphenols: Any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the 5-position of the
phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl
group whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to CP 47,497 and
its C8 homologue (cannabicyclohexanol);
(e) Naphthylmethylindoles: Any compound containing a 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-
naphthyl)methane structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
Page 71 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether
or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to JWH-175, JWH-184, and JWH-185;
(f) Naphthoylpyrroles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but
are not limited to JWH-030, JWH-145, JWH-146, JWH-307, and JWH-368;
(g) Naphthylmethylindenes: Any compound containing a 1-(1-
naphthylmethyl)indene structure with substitution at the 3-position of the
indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether
or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to JWH-176;
(h) Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl
group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and
whether or not further substituted in the tetramethylcyclopropyl ring to any
extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to UR-144
and XLR-11;
Page 72 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(i) Adamantoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-adamantoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the adamantyl ring system to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to AB-001 and AM-1248; or
(j) Any other synthetic cannabinoid or piperazine which is not approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not
dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law;
(52) "Synthetic cathinones" means any chemical compound which is not approved by
the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not
dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law (not including
bupropion or compounds listed under a different schedule) structurally derived from
2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either phenyl, naphthyl,
or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound is further modified in one
(1) or more of the following ways:
(a) By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy,
alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents, whether or not further
substituted in the ring system by one (1) or more other univalent substituents.
Examples of this class include but are not limited to 3,4-
Methylenedioxycathinone (bk-MDA);
(b) By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent. Examples
of this class include but are not limited to 2-methylamino-1-phenylbutan-1-
one (buphedrone);
(c) By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or
methoxybenzyl groups, or by inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a
Page 73 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
cyclic structure. Examples of this class include but are not limited to
Dimethylcathinone, Ethcathinone, and -Pyrrolidinopropiophenone (-PPP);
or
(d) Any other synthetic cathinone which is not approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or possessed
in accordance with state or federal law;
(53) "Synthetic drugs" means any synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines or any synthetic
cathinones;
(54) "Telehealth" has the same meaning it has in KRS 211.332;
(55) "Tetrahydrocannabinols" means synthetic equivalents of the substances contained
in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of the plant Cannabis, sp. or synthetic
substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and
pharmacological activity such as the following:
(a) Delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;
(b) Delta 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; and
(c) Delta 3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers;
(56) "Traffic," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means to manufacture, distribute,
dispense, sell, transfer, or possess with intent to manufacture, distribute, dispense,
or sell a controlled substance;
(57) "Transfer" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person without
consideration and not in furtherance of commercial distribution; and
(58) "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for
his or her own use or for the use of a member of his or her household or for
administering to an animal owned by him or her or by a member of his or her
household.
Section 24. KRS 218B.010 is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
Page 74 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(1) "Bona fide practitioner-patient relationship" means a treating or consulting
relationship, during the course of which a medicinal cannabis practitioner has:
(a) Completed an initial in-person examination and assessment of the patient's
medical history and current medical condition which shall include a review
of:
1. The patient's medical records for the previous twelve (12) months;
2. All other available medical records relevant to the patient's qualifying
medical condition;
3. Any medications that the patient is currently taking; and
4. Any other possible risks or side effects that may be associated with the
use of medicinal cannabis;
(b) Consulted with the patient with respect to the possible medical, therapeutic,
and palliative properties of medicinal cannabis;
(c) Advised the patient of the possible risks and side effects associated with the
use of medicinal cannabis, including possible interactions between medicinal
cannabis and any other drug or medication that the patient is taking at that
time; and
(d) Established an expectation that he or she will provide follow-up care and
treatment to the patient in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to KRS 218B.050(10);
(2) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(3) "Cannabis business" means an entity licensed under this chapter as a cultivator,
dispensary, processor, producer, or safety compliance facility;
(4) "Cannabis business agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee,
volunteer, or agent of a cannabis business;
(5) "Cardholder" means:
(a) A registered qualified patient, designated caregiver, or visiting qualified
Page 75 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
patient who has applied for, obtained, and possesses a valid registry
identification card issued by the cabinet; or
(b) A visiting qualified patient who has obtained and possesses:
1. A valid out-of-state registry identification card; and
2. Documentation of having been diagnosed with a qualifying medical
condition;
(6) "Cultivator" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090;
(7) "Cultivator agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer,
or agent of a cultivator;
(8) "Designated caregiver" means a person who has registered as such with the cabinet
under KRS 218B.055 and 218B.060;
(9) "Dispensary" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085,
and 218B.090;
(10) "Dispensary agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer,
or agent of a dispensary;
(11) "Disqualifying felony offense" means:
(a) A felony offense that resulted in the person being classified by the
Department of Corrections as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401; or
(b) A violation of a state or federal controlled substance law that was classified as
a felony in the jurisdiction where the person was convicted, except:
1. An offense for which the sentence, including any term of probation,
incarceration, or supervised release, was completed five (5) or more
years earlier; or
2. An offense that, as determined by the cabinet, consisted of conduct for
which this chapter would likely have prevented a conviction, but the
conduct either occurred prior to the enactment of this chapter or was
Page 76 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
prosecuted by an authority other than the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(12) "Enclosed, locked facility" means an indoor growing space such as a room,
greenhouse, building, or other indoor enclosed area that is maintained and operated
by a cultivator or producer and is equipped with locks and other security devices
that permit access only by authorized agents of the cultivator or producer, as
required by the cabinet;
(13) "Growth area" has the same meaning as an enclosed, locked facility;
(14) "Marijuana" has the same meaning as in KRS 218A.010;
(15) "Medicinal cannabis":
(a) Means marijuana as defined in KRS 218A.010 when cultivated, harvested,
processed, produced, transported, dispensed, distributed, sold, possessed, or
used in accordance with this chapter;
(b) Includes medicinal cannabis products and raw plant material; and
(c) Does not include[ industrial] hemp,[ or] industrial hemp products, and hemp-
derived cannabinoid products as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS
260.850];
(16) "Medicinal cannabis accessories" means any equipment, product, or material of any
kind which is used, intended for use, or designed for use in the preparing, storing,
using, or consuming medicinal cannabis in accordance with this chapter;
(17) "Medicinal cannabis practitioner" means a physician or an advanced practice
registered nurse who is authorized to prescribe controlled substances under KRS
314.042, who is authorized by his or her state licensing board to provide written
certifications pursuant to KRS 218B.050;
(18) "Medicinal cannabis product":
(a) Means any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation
of any part of the plant Cannabis sp., its seeds or its resin; or any compound,
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of these substances when
Page 77 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
cultivated, harvested, processed, produced, transported, dispensed, distributed,
sold, possessed, or used in accordance with this chapter; and
(b) Does not include industrial hemp products and hemp-derived cannabinoid
products as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS 260.850];
(19) "Minor" means a person less than eighteen (18) years of age;
(20) "Out-of-state registry identification card" means a registry identification card, or an
equivalent document, that was issued pursuant to the laws of another state, district,
territory, commonwealth, or insular possession of the United States;
(21) "Processor" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090;
(22) "Processor agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer, or
agent of a processor;
(23) "Producer" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090;
(24) "Producer agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer, or
agent of a producer;
(25) "Qualified patient" means a person who has obtained a written certification from a
medicinal cannabis practitioner with whom he or she has a bona fide practitioner-
patient relationship;
(26) "Qualifying medical condition" means:
(a) Any type or form of cancer regardless of stage;
(b) Chronic, severe, intractable, or debilitating pain;
(c) Epilepsy or any other intractable seizure disorder;
(d) Multiple sclerosis, muscle spasms, or spasticity;
(e) Chronic nausea or cyclical vomiting syndrome that has proven resistant to
other conventional medical treatments;
(f) Post-traumatic stress disorder; and
Page 78 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(g) Any other medical condition or disease for which the Kentucky Center for
Cannabis established in KRS 164.983, or its successor, determines that
sufficient scientific data and evidence exists to demonstrate that an individual
diagnosed with that condition or disease is likely to receive medical,
therapeutic, or palliative benefits from the use of medicinal cannabis;
(27) "Raw plant material":
(a) Means the trichome-covered part of the female plant Cannabis sp. or any
mixture of shredded leaves, stems, seeds, and flowers of the Cannabis sp.
plant; and
(b) Does not include plant material obtained from[ industrial] hemp as defined in
Section 1 of this Act[KRS 260.850];
(28) "Registered qualified patient" means a qualified patient who has applied for,
obtained, and possesses a valid registry identification card issued by the cabinet;
(29) "Registry identification card" means a document issued by the cabinet that
identifies a person as a registered qualified patient, visiting qualified patient, or
designated caregiver;
(30) "Safety compliance facility" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080,
218B.085, and 218B.090;
(31) "Safety compliance facility agent" means a principal officer, board member,
employee, volunteer, or agent of a safety compliance facility;
(32) "Seedling" means a medicinal cannabis plant that has no flowers and is not taller
than eight (8) inches;
(33) "Serious violation" means:
(a) Any violation of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated
thereunder that is capable of causing death or which causes serious and
prolonged disfigurement, prolonged impairment of health, or prolonged loss
or impairment of the function of any bodily organ;
Page 79 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(b) The diversion of medicinal cannabis for use not regulated pursuant to this
chapter; or
(c) Any act that would constitute a violation of KRS 218A.1421;
(34) "Smoking" means the inhalation of smoke produced from the combustion of raw
plant material when ignited by a flame;
(35) "State licensing board" means:
(a) The Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure; or
(b) The Kentucky Board of Nursing;
(36) "Telehealth" has the same meaning as in KRS 211.332;
(37) "Use of medicinal cannabis":
(a) Includes the acquisition, administration, possession, transfer, transportation,
or consumption of medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis accessories by a
cardholder in accordance with this chapter; and
(b) Does not include:
1. Cultivation of marijuana by a cardholder;
2. The use or consumption of marijuana by smoking; or
3. The use of[ industrial] hemp,[ or] industrial hemp products, and hemp-
derived cannabinoid products as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS
260.850];
(38) "Visiting qualified patient" means a person who has registered as such through the
cabinet as required under this chapter or who possesses a valid out-of-state registry
identification card and documentation of having been diagnosed with a qualifying
medical condition; and
(39) "Written certification" means a document dated and signed by a medicinal cannabis
practitioner, that:
(a) States, that in the medicinal cannabis practitioner's professional medical
opinion, the patient may receive medical, therapeutic, or palliative benefit
Page 80 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
from the use of medicinal cannabis;
(b) Specifies the qualifying medical condition or conditions for which the
medicinal cannabis practitioner believes the patient may receive medical,
therapeutic, or palliative benefit; and
(c) Affirms that the medicinal cannabis practitioner has a bona fide practitioner-
patient relationship with the patient.
Section 25. KRS 218B.015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Nothing in ]This chapter shall not be construed as applying to[ industrial] hemp,[
or] industrial hemp, or hemp-derived cannabinoid products as defined in Section 1
of this Act[KRS 260.850].
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and except as provided in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section and KRS 218B.035:
(a) The use of medicinal cannabis by a cardholder shall be considered lawful if
done in accordance with this chapter and any administrative regulations
promulgated thereunder;
(b) The acquisition, blending, cultivation, delivery, distribution, manufacturing,
manipulation, packaging for sale, preparation, possession, sale, testing,
transportation, or transfer of medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis
accessories by a cannabis business or cannabis business agent shall be
considered lawful if done in accordance with this chapter and any
administrative regulations promulgated thereunder;
(c) A registered qualified patient or visiting qualified patient shall not be
considered to be under the influence of medicinal cannabis solely because of
the presence of tetrahydrocannabinol metabolites, including but not limited to
the cannabinoid carboxy THC, which is also known as THC-COOH;
(d) A medicinal cannabis practitioner shall not be subject, under the laws of the
Commonwealth, to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied
Page 81 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
any right or privilege, including but not limited to a civil penalty or
disciplinary action by a state licensing board or by any other occupational or
professional licensing board, solely for providing written certifications or for
otherwise stating that, in the medicinal cannabis practitioner's professional
opinion, a patient may receive medical, therapeutic, or palliative benefit from
the use of medicinal cannabis, if done in accordance with this chapter;
(e) An attorney shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to
arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege,
including but not limited to a civil penalty or disciplinary action by the
Kentucky Court of Justice, Kentucky Bar Association, or by any other
professional licensing board, solely for providing an individual or cannabis
business with legal assistance related to activity that is no longer subject to
criminal penalties under state law pursuant to this chapter;[ and]
(f) A[No] person shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to
arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege,
including but not limited to a civil penalty or disciplinary action by an
occupational or professional licensing board, solely for providing assistance
or services, including but not limited to accounting services, financial
services, security services, or business consulting services, to any individual
or cannabis business related to activity that is no longer subject to criminal
penalties under state law pursuant to this chapter; and
(g) The Cabinet shall promulgate an emergency administrative regulation in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to permit the transfer or sale of hemp
floral material from a hemp cultivator licensed by the Kentucky Department
of Agriculture to a licensed processor, producer, or dispensary.
(3) [Nothing in ]Subsection (2) of this section shall not be construed or interpreted to:
(a) Prohibit the arrest, prosecution, or imposition of any other penalty arising
Page 82 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
from but not limited to breach of contract, breach of fiduciary duty,
negligence, or engaging in criminal activity that would constitute a felony or
misdemeanor; or
(b) Prevent a medicinal cannabis practitioner from being subject to administrative
penalties imposed by his or her state licensing board for any violation of this
chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated thereunder.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section and any other provision of law to the
contrary, a cardholder who is licensed under KRS Chapter 311 or KRS Chapter 314
may be subject to intervention or disciplinary action by his or her state licensing
board if:
(a) There is probable cause to believe that the cardholder has become impaired
by, or otherwise abused, medicinal cannabis; or
(b) The cardholder has a medically diagnosable disease that is characterized by
chronic, habitual, or periodic use of medicinal cannabis resulting in
interference with the cardholder's professional, social, or economic functions
in the community or the loss of powers of self-control regarding the use of
medicinal cannabis.
Section 26. KRS 241.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS Chapters 241 to 244, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Alcohol" means ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl or spirit of wine, from
whatever source or by whatever process it is produced;
(2) "Alcoholic beverage" means every liquid, solid, powder, or crystal, whether
patented or not, containing alcohol in an amount in excess of more than one percent
(1%) of alcohol by volume, which is fit for beverage purposes. It includes every
spurious or imitation liquor sold as, or under any name commonly used for,
alcoholic beverages, whether containing any alcohol or not. It does not include the
following products:
Page 83 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(a) Medicinal preparations manufactured in accordance with formulas prescribed
by the United States Pharmacopoeia, National Formulary, or the American
Institute of Homeopathy;
(b) Patented, patent, and proprietary medicines;
(c) Toilet, medicinal, and antiseptic preparations and solutions;
(d) Flavoring extracts and syrups;
(e) Denatured alcohol or denatured rum;
(f) Vinegar and preserved sweet cider;
(g) Wine for sacramental purposes; and
(h) Alcohol unfit for beverage purposes that is to be sold for legitimate external
use;
(3) (a) "Alcohol vaporizing device" or "AWOL device" means any device, machine,
or process that mixes liquor, spirits, or any other alcohol product with pure
oxygen or by any other means produces a vaporized alcoholic product used
for human consumption;
(b) "Alcohol vaporizing device" or "AWOL device" does not include an inhaler,
nebulizer, atomizer, or other device that is designed and intended by the
manufacturer to dispense a prescribed or over-the-counter medication or a
device installed and used by a licensee under this chapter to demonstrate the
aroma of an alcoholic beverage;
(4) "Automobile race track" means a facility primarily used for vehicle racing that has a
seating capacity of at least thirty thousand (30,000) people;
(5) "Barrel-aged and batched cocktail" means an alcoholic beverage that is:
(a) Composed of:
1. Distilled spirits that have been dispensed from their original sealed
container; and
2. Other ingredients or alcoholic beverages;
Page 84 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(b) Placed into a barrel or container on the premises of a retail licensee; and
(c) Dispensed from the barrel or container as a retail sale by the drink;
(6) "Bed and breakfast" means a one (1) family dwelling unit that:
(a) Has guest rooms or suites used, rented, or hired out for occupancy or that are
occupied for sleeping purposes by persons not members of the single-family
unit;
(b) Holds a permit under KRS Chapter 219; and
(c) Has an innkeeper who resides on the premises or property adjacent to the
premises during periods of occupancy;
(7) "Board" means the State Alcoholic Beverage Control Board created by KRS
241.030;
(8) "Bottle" means any container which is used for holding alcoholic beverages for the
use and sale of alcoholic beverages at retail;
(9) "Brewer" means any person who manufactures malt beverages or owns, occupies,
carries on, works, or conducts any brewery, either alone or through an agent;
(10) "Brewery" means any place or premises where malt beverages are manufactured for
sale, and includes all offices, granaries, mash rooms, cooling rooms, vaults, yards,
and storerooms connected with the premises; or where any part of the process of the
manufacture of malt beverages is carried on; or where any apparatus connected with
manufacture is kept or used; or where any of the products of brewing or
fermentation are stored or kept;
(11) "Building containing licensed premises" means the licensed premises themselves
and includes the land, tract of land, or parking lot in which the premises are
contained, and any part of any building connected by direct access or by an
entrance which is under the ownership or control of the licensee by lease holdings
or ownership;
(12)[ "Cannabinoid" means a compound found in the hemp plant Cannabis sativa L. from
Page 85 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
a United States Department of Agriculture-sanctioned domestic hemp production
program and does not include cannabinoids derived from any other substance;
(13) "Cannabis-infused beverage":
(a) Means a properly permitted adult-use cannabinoid liquid product intended for
human consumption that has intoxicating properties that change the function
of the nervous system and results in alterations of perception, cognition, or
behavior and shall not contain more than five (5) milligrams of intoxicating
adult-use cannabinoids per twelve (12) ounce serving; and
(b) Shall not include:
1. Medicinal cannabis regulated under KRS Chapter 218B;
2. Any type of hemp tincture; and
3. Any product containing solely nonintoxicating cannabinoids;
(14)] "Caterer" means a person operating a food service business that prepares food in a
licensed and inspected commissary, transports the food and alcoholic beverages to
the caterer's designated and inspected banquet hall or to an agreed location, and
serves the food and alcoholic beverages pursuant to an agreement with another
person;
(13)[(15)] "Charitable organization" means a nonprofit entity recognized as exempt from
federal taxation under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. sec.
501(c), or any organization having been established and continuously operating
within the Commonwealth of Kentucky for charitable purposes for three (3) years
and which expends at least sixty percent (60%) of its gross revenue exclusively for
religious, educational, literary, civic, fraternal, or patriotic purposes;
(14)[(16)] "Cider" means any fermented fruit-based beverage containing seven percent
(7%) or more alcohol by volume and includes hard cider and perry cider;
(15)[(17)] "City administrator" means city alcoholic beverage control administrator;
(16)[(18)] "Commercial airport" means an airport through which more than five hundred
Page 86 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
thousand (500,000) passengers arrive or depart annually;
(17)[(19)] (a) "Commercial quadricycle" means a vehicle equipped with a minimum
of ten (10) pairs of fully operative pedals for propulsion by means of human
muscular power and which:
1. Has four (4) wheels;
2. Is operated in a manner similar to that of a bicycle;
3. Is equipped with a minimum of thirteen (13) seats for passengers;
4. Has a unibody design;
5. Is equipped with a minimum of four (4) hydraulically operated brakes;
6. Is used for commercial tour purposes;
7. Is operated by the vehicle owner or an employee of the owner; and
8. Has an electrical assist system that shall only be used when traveling to
or from its storage location while not carrying passengers.
(b) A "commercial quadricycle" is not a motor vehicle as defined in KRS 186.010
or 189.010;
(18)[(20)] "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Alcoholic
Beverage Control;
(19)[(21)] "Consumer" means a person, persons, or business organization who purchases
alcoholic beverages and who:
(a) Does not hold a license or permit issued by the department;
(b) Purchases the alcoholic beverages for personal consumption only and not for
resale;
(c) Is of lawful drinking age; and
(d) Receives the alcoholic beverages in territory where the alcoholic beverages
may be lawfully sold or received;
(20)[(22)] "Convention center" means any facility which, in its usual and customary
business, provides seating for a minimum of one thousand (1,000) people and offers
Page 87 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
convention facilities and related services for seminars, training and educational
purposes, trade association meetings, conventions, or civic and community events
or for plays, theatrical productions, or cultural exhibitions;
(21)[(23)] "Convicted" and "conviction" means a finding of guilt resulting from a plea of
guilty, the decision of a court, or the finding of a jury, irrespective of a
pronouncement of judgment or the suspension of the judgment;
(22)[(24)] "County administrator" means county alcoholic beverage control
administrator;
(23)[(25)] "Department" means the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control;
(24)[(26)] "Dining car" means a railroad passenger car that serves meals to consumers
on any railroad or Pullman car company;
(25)[(27)] "Discount in the usual course of business" means price reductions, rebates,
refunds, and discounts given by wholesalers to distilled spirits and wine retailers
pursuant to an agreement made at the time of the sale of the merchandise involved
and are considered a part of the sales transaction, constituting reductions in price
pursuant to the terms of the sale, irrespective of whether the quantity discount was:
(a) Prorated and allowed on each delivery;
(b) Given in a lump sum after the entire quantity of merchandise purchased had
been delivered; or
(c) Based on dollar volume or on the quantity of merchandise purchased;
(26)[(28)] "Distilled spirits" or "spirits" means any product capable of being consumed
by a human being which contains alcohol obtained by distilling, mixed with water
or other substances in solution, except wine, hard cider, and malt beverages;
(27)[(29)] "Distiller" means any person who is engaged in the business of manufacturing
distilled spirits at any distillery in the state and is registered in the Office of the
Collector of Internal Revenue for the United States at Louisville, Kentucky;
(28)[(30)] "Distillery" means any place or premises where distilled spirits are
Page 88 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
manufactured for sale, and which are registered in the office of any collector of
internal revenue for the United States. It includes any United States government
bonded warehouse;
(29)[(31)] "Distributor" means any person who distributes malt beverages for the
purpose of being sold at retail;
(30)[(32)] "Dry" means a territory in which a majority of the electorate voted to prohibit
all forms of retail alcoholic beverage sales through a local option election held
under KRS Chapter 242;
(31)[(33)] "Election" means:
(a) An election held for the purpose of taking the sense of the people as to the
application or discontinuance of alcoholic beverage sales under KRS Chapter
242; or
(b) Any other election not pertaining to alcoholic beverages;
(32)[(34)] "Horse racetrack" means a facility licensed to conduct a horse race meeting
under KRS Chapter 230;
(33)[(35)] "Hotel" means a hotel, motel, or inn for accommodation of the traveling
public, designed primarily to serve transient patrons;
(34)[(36)] "Investigator" means any employee or agent of the department who is
regularly employed and whose primary function is to travel from place to place for
the purpose of visiting licensees, and any employee or agent of the department who
is assigned, temporarily or permanently, by the commissioner to duty outside the
main office of the department at Frankfort, in connection with the administration of
alcoholic beverage statutes;
(35)[(37)] "License" means any license issued pursuant to KRS Chapters 241 to 244;
(36)[(38)] "Licensee" means any person to whom a license has been issued, pursuant to
KRS Chapters 241 to 244;
(37)[(39)] "Limited restaurant" means:
Page 89 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(a) A facility where the usual and customary business is the preparation and
serving of meals to consumers, which has a bona fide kitchen facility, which
receives at least seventy percent (70%) of its food and alcoholic beverage
receipts from the sale of food, which maintains a minimum seating capacity of
fifty (50) persons for dining, which has no open bar, which requires that
alcoholic beverages be sold in conjunction with the sale of a meal, and which
is located in a wet or moist territory under KRS 242.1244; or
(b) A facility where the usual and customary business is the preparation and
serving of meals to consumers, which has a bona fide kitchen facility, which
receives at least seventy percent (70%) of its food and alcoholic beverage
receipts from the sale of food, which maintains a minimum seating capacity of
one hundred (100) persons of dining, and which is located in a wet or moist
territory under KRS 242.1244;
(38)[(40)] "Local administrator" means a city alcoholic beverage control administrator,
county alcoholic beverage control administrator, or urban-county alcoholic
beverage control administrator;
(39)[(41)] "Malt beverage" means any fermented undistilled alcoholic beverage of any
name or description, manufactured from malt wholly or in part, or from any
substitute for malt, and includes weak cider;
(40)[(42)] "Manufacture" means distill, rectify, brew, bottle, and operate a winery;
(41)[(43)] "Manufacturer" means a winery, distiller, rectifier, or brewer, and any other
person engaged in the production or bottling of alcoholic beverages;
(42)[(44)] "Marina" means a dock or basin providing moorings for boats and offering
supply, repair, or other services for remuneration;
(43)[(45)] "Minor" means any person who is not twenty-one (21) years of age or older;
(44)[(46)] "Moist" means a territory in which a majority of the electorate voted to permit
limited alcoholic beverage sales by any one (1) or a combination of special limited
Page 90 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
local option elections authorized by KRS Chapter 242;
(45)[(47)] "Population" means the population figures established by the federal
decennial census for a census year or the current yearly population estimates
prepared by the Kentucky State Data Center, Urban Studies Center of the
University of Louisville, Louisville, Kentucky, for all other years;
(46)[(48)] "Premises" means the land and building in and upon which any business
regulated by alcoholic beverage statutes is operated or carried on. "Premises" shall
not include as a single unit two (2) or more separate businesses of one (1) owner on
the same lot or tract of land, in the same or in different buildings if physical and
permanent separation of the premises is maintained, excluding employee access by
keyed entry and emergency exits equipped with crash bars, and each has a separate
public entrance accessible directly from the sidewalk or parking lot. Any licensee
holding an alcoholic beverage license on July 15, 1998, shall not, by reason of this
subsection, be ineligible to continue to hold his or her license or obtain a renewal,
of the license;
(47)[(49)] "Primary source of supply" or "supplier" means the distiller, winery, brewer,
producer, owner of the commodity at the time it becomes a marketable product,
bottler, or authorized agent of the brand owner. In the case of imported products,
the primary source of supply means either the foreign producer, owner, bottler, or
agent of the prime importer from, or the exclusive agent in, the United States of the
foreign distiller, producer, bottler, or owner;
(48)[(50)] "Private club" means a nonprofit social, fraternal, military, or political
organization, club, or nonprofit or for-profit entity maintaining or operating a club
room, club rooms, or premises from which the general public is excluded;
(49)[(51)] "Private selection event" means a private event with a licensed distiller during
which participating consumers, retail licensees, wholesalers, distributors, or a
distillery's own representatives select a single barrel or a blend of barrels of the
Page 91 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
distiller's products to be specially packaged for the participants;
(50)[(52)] "Private selection package" means a bottle of distilled spirits sourced from the
barrel or barrels selected by participating consumers, retail licensees, wholesalers,
distributors, microbreweries that hold a quota retail drink or quota retail package
license, or a distillery's own representatives during a private selection event;
(51)[(53)] "Public nuisance" means a condition that endangers safety or health, is
offensive to the senses, or obstructs the free use of property so as to interfere with
the comfortable enjoyment of life or property by a community or neighborhood or
by any considerable number of persons;
(52)[(54)] "Qualified historic site" means:
(a) A contributing property with dining facilities for at least fifty (50) persons at
tables, booths, or bars where food may be served within a commercial district
listed in the National Register of Historic Places;
(b) A site that is listed as a National Historic Landmark or in the National
Register of Historic Places with dining facilities for at least fifty (50) persons
at tables, booths, or bars where food may be served;
(c) A distillery which is listed as a National Historic Landmark and which
conducts souvenir retail package sales under KRS 243.0305; or
(d) A not-for-profit or nonprofit facility listed on the National Register of Historic
Places;
(53)[(55)] "Rectifier" means any person who rectifies, purifies, or refines distilled
spirits, malt, or wine by any process other than as provided for on distillery
premises, and every person who, without rectifying, purifying, or refining distilled
spirits by mixing alcoholic beverages with any materials, manufactures any
imitations of or compounds liquors for sale under the name of whiskey, brandy, gin,
rum, wine, spirits, cordials, bitters, or any other name;
(54)[(56)] "Repackaging" means the placing of alcoholic beverages in any retail
Page 92 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
container irrespective of the material from which the container is made;
(55)[(57)] "Restaurant" means a facility where the usual and customary business is the
preparation and serving of meals to consumers, that has a bona fide kitchen facility,
and that receives at least fifty percent (50%) of its food and alcoholic beverage
receipts from the sale of food at the premises;
(56)[(58)] "Retail container" means any bottle, can, barrel, or other container which,
without a separable intermediate container, holds alcoholic beverages and is
suitable and destined for sale to a retail outlet, whether it is suitable for delivery or
shipment to the consumer or not;
(57)[(59)] "Retail sale" means any sale of alcoholic beverages to a consumer, including
those transactions taking place in person, electronically, online, by mail, or by
telephone;
(58)[(60)] "Retailer" means any licensee who sells and delivers any alcoholic beverage
to consumers, except for manufacturers with limited retail sale privileges and direct
shipper licensees;
(59)[(61)] "Riverboat" means any boat or vessel with a regular place of mooring in this
state that is licensed by the United States Coast Guard to carry forty (40) or more
passengers for hire on navigable waters in or adjacent to this state;
(60)[(62)] "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter for consideration, and includes
all sales made by any person, whether principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or
employee, of any alcoholic beverage;
(61)[(63)] "Service bar" means a bar, counter, shelving, or similar structure used for
storing or stocking supplies of alcoholic beverages that is a workstation where
employees prepare alcoholic beverage drinks to be delivered to customers away
from the service bar;
(62)[(64)] "Sell" includes solicit or receive an order for, keep or expose for sale, keep
with intent to sell, and the delivery of any alcoholic beverage;
Page 93 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(63)[(65)] "Small farm winery" means a winery whose wine production is not less than
two hundred fifty (250) gallons and not greater than five hundred thousand
(500,000) gallons in a calendar year;
(64)[(66)] "Souvenir package" means a special package of distilled spirits available from
a licensed retailer that is:
(a) Available for retail sale at a licensed Kentucky distillery where the distilled
spirits were produced or bottled; or
(b) Available for retail sale at a licensed Kentucky distillery but produced or
bottled at another of that distiller's licensed distilleries in Kentucky;
(65)[(67)] "State administrator" or "administrator" means the distilled spirits
administrator or the malt beverages administrator, or both, as the context requires;
(66)[(68)] "State park" means a state park that has a:
(a) Nine (9) or eighteen (18) hole golf course; or
(b) Full-service lodge and dining room;
(67)[(69)] "Supplemental bar" means a bar, counter, shelving, or similar structure used
for serving and selling distilled spirits or wine by the drink for consumption on the
licensed premises to guests and patrons from additional locations other than the
main bar;
(68)[(70)] "Territory" means a county, city, district, or precinct;
(69)[(71)] "Urban-county administrator" means an urban-county alcoholic beverage
control administrator;
(70)[(72)] "Valid identification document" means an unexpired, government-issued form
of identification that contains the photograph and date of birth of the individual to
whom it is issued;
(71)[(73)] "Vehicle" means any device or animal used to carry, convey, transport, or
otherwise move alcoholic beverages or any products, equipment, or appurtenances
used to manufacture, bottle, or sell these beverages;
Page 94 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(72)[(74)] "Vintage distilled spirit" means:
(a) A private selection package; or
(b) A package or packages of distilled spirits that:
1. Are in their original manufacturer's unopened container;
2. Are not owned by a distillery; and
3. Are not otherwise available for purchase from a licensed wholesaler
within the Commonwealth;
(73)[(75)] (a) "Vintage distilled spirits seller" means a nonlicensed person at least
twenty-one (21) years of age who is:
1. An administrator, executor, receiver, or other fiduciary who receives and
sells vintage distilled spirits in execution of the person's fiduciary
capacity;
2. A creditor who receives or takes possession of vintage distilled spirits as
security for, or in payment of, debt, in whole or in part;
3. A public officer or court official who levies on vintage distilled spirits
under order or process of any court or magistrate to sell the vintage
distilled spirits in satisfaction of the order or process; or
4. Any other person not engaged in the business of selling alcoholic
beverages.
(b) "Vintage distilled spirits seller" does not mean:
1. A person selling alcoholic beverages as part of an approved KRS
243.630 transfer; or
2. A person selling alcoholic beverages as authorized by KRS 243.540;
(74)[(76)] "Warehouse" means any place in which alcoholic beverages are housed or
stored;
(75)[(77)] "Weak cider" means any fermented fruit-based beverage containing more than
one percent (1%) but less than seven percent (7%) alcohol by volume;
Page 95 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(76)[(78)] "Wet" means a territory in which a majority of the electorate voted to permit
all forms of retail alcoholic beverage sales by a local option election under KRS
242.050 or 242.125 on the following question: "Are you in favor of the sale of
alcoholic beverages in (name of territory)?";
(77)[(79)] "Wholesale sale" means a sale to any person for the purpose of resale;
(78)[(80)] "Wholesaler" means any person who distributes alcoholic beverages for the
purpose of being sold at retail, but it shall not include a subsidiary of a
manufacturer or cooperative of a retail outlet;
(79)[(81)] "Wine" means the product of the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juices
of fruits, with the usual processes of manufacture and normal additions, and
includes champagne and sparkling and fortified wine of an alcoholic content not to
exceed twenty-four percent (24%) by volume. It includes sake, cider, hard cider,
and perry cider and also includes preparations or mixtures vended in retail
containers if these preparations or mixtures contain not more than fifteen percent
(15%) of alcohol by volume. It does not include weak cider; and
(80)[(82)] "Winery" means any place or premises in which wine is manufactured from
any fruit, or brandies are distilled as a by-product of wine or other fruit, or cordials
are compounded, except a place or premises that manufactures wine for sacramental
purposes exclusively.
Section 27. KRS 241.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall administer statutes relating to, and regulate traffic in,
alcoholic beverages, except that the collection of taxes shall be administered by the
Department of Revenue. The department may issue advisory opinions and
declaratory rulings related to KRS Chapters 241 to 244 and the administrative
regulations promulgated under those chapters.
(2)[ Notwithstanding any other statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
department shall have authority to administer statutes relating to, and regulate the
Page 96 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
retail licensing and distribution of, cannabis-infused beverages.
(3)] A Division of Distilled Spirits, under the supervision of the board, shall administer
the laws in relation to traffic in distilled spirits and[,] wine[, and cannabis-infused
beverages].
(3)[(4)] A Division of Malt Beverages, under the supervision of the board, shall
administer the laws in relation to traffic in malt beverages.
(4)[(5)] A Division of Tobacco, Nicotine, and Vapor Product Licensing, under the
supervision of the division director, shall administer the laws in relation to traffic in
alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, and authorized nicotine vapor
products under KRS 438.305 to 438.350.
Section 28. KRS 241.060 is amended to read as follows:
The board shall have the following functions, powers, and duties:
(1) To promulgate reasonable administrative regulations governing procedures relative
to the applications for and revocations of licenses, the supervision and control of the
use, manufacture, sale, transportation, storage, advertising, and trafficking of
alcoholic beverages,[ the retail licensing and distribution of cannabis-infused
beverages,] and all other matters over which the board has jurisdiction. The only
administrative regulation that shall be promulgated in relation to the direct shipper
license is to establish the license application, as set forth in KRS 243.027(4). To the
extent any administrative regulation previously promulgated is contrary to the
provisions of KRS 13A.120(2), the board shall repeal or amend the administrative
regulation as necessary by January 1, 2022. Administrative regulations need not be
uniform in their application but may vary in accordance with reasonable
classifications;
(2) To limit the number of licenses of each kind or class to be issued in this state or any
political subdivision, and restrict the locations of licensed premises. To this end, the
board may make reasonable division and subdivision of the state or any political
Page 97 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
subdivision into districts. Administrative regulations relating to the approval,
denial, and revocation of licenses may be different within the several divisions or
subdivisions;
(3) To hold hearings in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B. The
department may pay witnesses the per diem and mileage provided in KRS 421.015;
(4) To conduct hearings and appeals under KRS 241.150, 241.200, 241.260, 243.470,
243.520, 438.308, 438.309, 438.312, 438.316, and 438.340 and render final orders
upon the subjects of the hearings and appeals;
(5) (a) To order the destruction of evidence, other than contraband alcoholic
beverages suitable for public auction under paragraph (b) of this subsection, in
the department's possession after all administrative and judicial proceedings
are conducted.
(b) To dispose of contraband alcoholic beverages through public auction if:
1. A final order relating to those contraband alcoholic beverages has been
entered after all administrative and judicial proceedings are conducted,
if applicable;
2. The entire proceeds of the public auction are donated to the alcohol
wellness and responsibility education fund established in KRS 211.285;
and
3. The board deems the inventory safe to release to the public, including
but not limited to the alcoholic beverages being in their original,
unopened packaging;
(6) To suspend, revoke, or cancel for cause, after a hearing in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B, any license; and
(7) To prohibit the issuance of a license for the premises until the expiration of two (2)
years from the time the offense was committed if a violation of KRS Chapters 241
to 244 has taken place on the premises which the owner knew of or should have
Page 98 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
known of, or was committed or permitted in or on the premises owned by the
licensee.
Section 29. KRS 241.080 is amended to read as follows:
The distilled spirits administrator may approve and issue or deny any state license
authorizing traffic in distilled spirits and wine[ or in cannabis-infused beverages]. The
malt beverages administrator may approve and issue or deny any state license authorizing
traffic in malt beverages. Both the distilled spirits administrator and the malt beverages
administrator may approve and issue or deny state licenses authorizing the traffic in
alcoholic beverages.
Section 30. KRS 241.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) State administrators and all investigators shall have the full police powers of peace
officers, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and their jurisdiction
shall be coextensive with the state. They may inspect any premises where alcoholic
beverages are manufactured, sold, stored, or otherwise trafficked in[ or any
premises where cannabis-infused beverages are sold, stored, or otherwise trafficked
in,] without first obtaining a search warrant. They may confiscate any contraband
property. The jurisdiction and police powers of state administrators and all
investigators during an emergency declared under KRS Chapter 39A shall be
subject to the limitations of KRS 39A.090.
(2) A state administrator shall not have the power to make arrests unless he or she is
certified in accordance with KRS 15.380 to 15.404.
Section 31. KRS 243.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not do any act authorized by any kind of license with respect to the
manufacture, storage, sale, purchase, transporting, or other traffic in alcoholic
beverages[ or the distribution, retail sale, or transportation of cannabis-infused
beverages] unless the person holds or is an independent contractor, agent, servant,
or employee of a person who holds the kind of license that authorizes the act, or is a
Page 99 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
third party utilized by a direct shipper licensee as set forth in KRS 243.027.
(2) The holding of any permit from the United States government to traffic in alcoholic
beverages without the corresponding requisite state and local licenses shall in all
cases raise a rebuttable presumption that the holder of the United States permit is
unlawfully trafficking in alcoholic beverages.
(3) Except as permitted by KRS 243.033, 243.036, 243.155, 243.157, and 243.260, a
person, conducting a place of business patronized by the public, who is not a
licensee authorized to sell alcoholic beverages, shall not permit any person to sell,
barter, loan, give away, or drink alcoholic beverages on the premises of the place of
business.
(4) A licensee shall not permit any consumer to possess, give away, or drink alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] on the licensed premises that are not
purchased from the licensee.
(5) In a moist territory, the only types of licenses that may be issued are those that
directly correspond with the types of sales approved by the voters through moist
elections within the territory, unless otherwise specifically authorized by statute.
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (3) and (4) of this section, with the written permission
of a licensed entertainment destination center:
(a) A retail drink licensee located wholly within a licensed entertainment
destination center or that has a storefront sharing a physical boundary with
that licensed entertainment destination center may allow persons on the
licensee's premises to possess and drink alcoholic beverages that were
purchased from another retail drink licensee located wholly within, or that has
a storefront sharing a physical boundary with, the licensed entertainment
destination center; and
(b) A nonlicensed place of business that is located wholly within a licensed
entertainment destination center or that has a storefront sharing a physical
Page 100 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
boundary with that licensed entertainment destination center may allow
persons on its property to possess and drink alcoholic beverages that were
purchased from a retail drink licensee located wholly within, or that has a
storefront sharing a physical boundary with, the licensed entertainment
destination center.
Section 32. KRS 243.027 is amended to read as follows:
(1) KRS 243.027 to 243.029 shall supersede any conflicting statute in KRS Chapters
241 to 244.
(2) A direct shipper[ Type A] license shall authorize the holder to ship alcoholic
beverages to consumers[. A direct shipper Type B license shall authorize the holder
to ship cannabis-infused beverages to consumers]. The department shall issue a
direct shipper license to a successful applicant that:
(a) Pays the applicable annual license fee;
(b) Is a manufacturer located in this state or any other state[, a cannabis-infused
beverage manufacturer licensed by the Department for Public Health,] or an
alcoholic beverage supplier licensed under KRS 243.212 or 243.215; and
(c) Holds a current license, permit, or other authorization to manufacture or
supply alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] in the state where
the applicant is located. If an applicant is located outside of Kentucky, proof
of its current license, permit, or other authorization as issued by its home state
shall be sufficient proof of its eligibility to hold a direct shipper license in
Kentucky.
(3) (a) A manufacturer applicant shall only be authorized to ship beverages that are
sold under a brand name owned or exclusively licensed to the manufacturer,
provided the beverages were:
1. Produced by the manufacturer;
2. Produced for the manufacturer under a written contract with another
Page 101 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
manufacturer; or
3. Bottled or canned for or by the manufacturer.
(b) An applicant licensed under KRS 243.212 or 243.215 shall only be authorized
to ship alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] for which it is the
primary source of supply.
(4) The department shall establish the form for a direct shipper license application
through the promulgation of an administrative regulation. These requirements shall
include only the following:
(a) The address of the manufacturer or supplier; and
(b) If the applicant is located outside this state, a copy of the applicant's current
license, permit, or other authorization to manufacture, store, or supply
alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] in the state where the
applicant is located.
(5) For purposes of this section, the holder of a direct shipper license may utilize the
services of a third party to fulfill shipments, subject to the following:
(a) The third party shall not be required to hold any alcoholic beverage license[ or
cannabis-infused beverage license], but no licensed entity shall serve as a
third party to fulfill shipments other than the holder of a storage license or
transporter's license;
(b) The third party may operate from the premises of the direct shipper licensee
or from another business location; and
(c) The direct shipper licensee shall be liable for any violation of KRS 242.250,
242.260, 242.270, or 244.080 that may occur by the third party.
(6) A direct shipper licensee shall:
(a) Agree that the Secretary of State shall serve as its registered agent for service
of process. The licensee shall agree that legal service on the agent constitutes
legal service on the direct shipper licensee;
Page 102 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(b) Maintain the records required under KRS 243.027 to 243.029 and provide the
department and the Department of Revenue access to or copies of these
records;
(c) Allow the department or the Department of Revenue to perform an audit of
the direct shipper licensee's records or an inspection of the direct shipper
licensee's licensed premises upon request. If an audit or inspection reveals a
violation, the department or the Department of Revenue may recover
reasonable expenses from the licensee for the cost of the audit or inspection;
(d) Register with the Department of Revenue, and file all reports and pay all taxes
required under KRS 243.027 to 243.029; and
(e) Submit to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any
violation of KRS 242.250, 242.260, 242.270, or 244.080 or for nonpayment
of any taxes owed.
(7) (a) Each direct shipper licensee shall submit to the department and the
Department of Revenue a quarterly report for that direct shipper license
showing:
1. The total amount of beverages shipped into the state per consumer;
2. The name and address of each consumer;
3. The purchase price of the beverages shipped and the amount of taxes
charged to the consumer for the beverages shipped; and
4. The name and address of each common carrier.
(b) The Department of Revenue shall create a form through the promulgation of
an administrative regulation for reporting under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) The department shall provide a list of all active direct shipper licensees to
licensed common carriers on a quarterly basis to reduce the number of
unlicensed shipments in the Commonwealth.
Page 103 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(8) A direct shipper licensee shall submit a current copy of its alcoholic beverage
license[ or cannabis-infused beverage license] from its home state along with the
applicable license fee every year upon renewal of its direct shipper license.
(9) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a manufacturer
located and licensed in Kentucky may ship by a common carrier holding a
Kentucky transporter's license samples of alcoholic beverages produced by the
manufacturer in quantities not to exceed one (1) liter, per any recipient, of any
individual product in one (1) calendar year of distilled spirits or wine, or ninety-six
(96) ounces, per any recipient, of any individual product in one (1) calendar year of
malt beverages, to any of the following:
(a) Marketing or media representatives twenty-one (21) years of age or older;
(b) Distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverage competitions or contests;
(c) Wholesalers or distributors located outside of Kentucky;
(d) Federal, state, or other regulatory testing labs;
(e) Third-party product formulation and development partners; and
(f) Persons or entities engaged in a private selection event pursuant to KRS
243.0305.
Such samples shall be marked by affixing across the product label, a not readily
removed disclaimer with the words "Sample-Not for Sale" and the name of the
manufacturer.
Section 33. KRS 243.028 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A direct shipper licensee may sell or ship to a consumer all types of alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] that the licensee is authorized to sell,
with the following aggregate limits:
(a) Distilled spirits, in quantities not to exceed ten (10) liters per consumer per
month;
(b) Wine, in quantities not to exceed ten (10) cases per consumer per month; and
Page 104 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(c) Malt beverages, in quantities not to exceed ten (10) cases per consumer per
month[; and
(d) Cannabis-infused beverages, in quantities not to exceed ten (10) cases per
customer per month].
(2) The direct shipper licensee shall notify the consumer placing the order that the
shipment shall not be left unless the recipient of the shipment provides a valid
identification document at the time verifying that the recipient is at least twenty-one
(21) years of age. All beverage containers shipped to the consumer shall be
conspicuously labeled with the words "CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF
PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY"[ or "CONTAINS
CANNABIS-INFUSED BEVERAGES: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR
OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY", as appropriate] for each shipment.
(3) At the time of delivery, the recipient of the shipment shall present to the individual
delivering the package a valid identification document. Prior to transferring
possession of the package, the individual delivering the package shall visually
inspect the document and verify the identity of the recipient and, by visual
examination or by using age verification technology, that the recipient is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
(4) Before transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the package
shall obtain the signature of the recipient of the shipment. The individual who
receives and signs for the beverages is not required to be the consumer who
purchased the beverages.
(5) A consumer who intentionally causes shipment to an address deemed unlawful
shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of two
hundred fifty dollars ($250), and for each subsequent offense, be guilty of a
violation punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500). In this instance, the
direct shipper licensee and the common carrier shall be held harmless.
Page 105 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(6) A direct shipper licensee may not sell or ship beverages to a consumer from its
licensed premises if the consumer's address is located in an area in which that type
of beverages may not be sold or received.
(7) Shipments made pursuant to this section shall be made through a common carrier.
(8) If a common carrier is unable to complete delivery, then the beverages shall be
returned to the consignor.
Section 34. KRS 243.030 is amended to read as follows:
The following licenses that authorize traffic in distilled spirits and wine[ and in cannabis-
infused beverages] may be issued by the distilled spirits administrator. Licenses that
authorize traffic in all alcoholic beverages may be issued by both the distilled spirits
administrator and malt beverages administrator. The licenses and their accompanying
fees are as follows:
(1) Distiller's license:
(a) Class A, per annum .............................................................................$3,090.00
(b) Class B (craft distillery), per annum ....................................................$1,000.00
(c) Off-premises retail sales outlet, per annum ............................................$300.00
(2) Rectifier's license:
(a) Class A, per annum .............................................................................$2,580.00
(b) Class B (craft rectifier), per annum ........................................................$825.00
(3) Winery license, per annum ..........................................................................$1,030.00
(4) Small farm winery license, per annum ...........................................................$110.00
(a) Small farm winery off-premises retail license, per annum ......................$30.00
(5) Wholesaler's license, per annum ..................................................................$2,060.00
(6) Quota retail package license, per annum .........................................................$570.00
(7) Quota retail drink license, per annum ..............................................................$620.00
(8) Transporter's license, per annum ....................................................................$210.00
(9) Special nonbeverage alcohol license, per annum .............................................$60.00
Page 106 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(10) Special agent's or solicitor's license, per annum ...............................................$30.00
(11) Bottling house or bottling house storage license, per annum ......... .............$1,030.00
(12) Special temporary license, per event ..............................................................$100.00
(13) Special Sunday retail drink license, per annum ...............................................$520.00
(14) Caterer's license, per annum ...........................................................................$830.00
(15) Special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license, per event ...................$100.00
(16) Extended hours supplemental license, per annum .......................................$2,060.00
(17) Hotel in-room license, per annum ...................................................................$210.00
(18) Air transporter license, per annum ..................................................................$520.00
(19) Sampling license, per annum ...........................................................................$110.00
(20) Replacement or duplicate license ......................................................................$25.00
(21) Entertainment destination center license:
(a) When the licensee is a city, county, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, charter county government, or
unified local government, per annum .................................................$2,577.00
(b) All other licensees, per annum ............................................................$7,730.00
(22) Limited restaurant license, per annum .............................................................$780.00
(23) Limited golf course license, per annum ...........................................................$720.00
(24) Small farm winery wholesaler's license, per annum .......................................$110.00
(25) Qualified historic site license, per annum ....................................................$1,030.00
(26) Nonquota type 1 license, per annum ........................ ...................................$4,120.00
(27) Nonquota type 2 license, per annum ................................................................$830.00
(28) Nonquota type 3 license, per annum ................................................................$310.00
(29) Distilled spirits and wine storage license, per annum ..................................$620.00
(30) Out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier's license, per annum ...........$1,550.00
(31) Limited out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier's
license, per annum ..........................................................................................$260.00
Page 107 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(32) Authorized public consumption license, per annum ........................................$250.00
(33) Direct shipper[ Type A] license, per annum ....................................................$100.00
(34) Limited nonquota package license, per annum ................................................$300.00
(35) Vintage distilled spirits license, per annum .....................................................$300.00
(36)[ Cannabis-infused beverage retail package license, per annum .....................$2,000.00
(37) Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license, per annum ........................$1,000.00
(38) Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license,
supplemental, per annum ..............................................................................$1,000.00
(39) Direct shipper Type B license, per annum ....................................................$1,000.00
(40)] A nonrefundable fee of sixty dollars ($60) shall be charged to process each new
transitional license pursuant to KRS 243.045.
(37)[(41)] Other special licenses the board finds necessary for the proper regulation and
control of the traffic in distilled spirits and wine and provides for by administrative
regulation. In establishing the amount of license taxes that are required to be fixed
by the board, it shall have regard for the value of the privilege granted.
(38)[(42)] The fee for each of the first five (5) supplemental bar licenses shall be the
same as the fee for the primary retail drink license. There shall be no charge for
each supplemental license issued in excess of five (5) to the same licensee at the
same premises.
A nonrefundable application fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be charged to process each
new application under this section, except for subsections (4), (8), (9), (10), (12), (15),
(19), and (20) of this section. The application fee shall be applied to the licensing fee if
the license is issued; otherwise it shall be retained by the department.
Section 35. KRS 243.034 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited restaurant license may be issued to an establishment meeting the
definition criteria established in KRS 241.010(37)[(39)] as long as the
establishment is within:
Page 108 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(a) Any wet territory; or
(b) Any moist precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under
KRS 242.1244.
(2) A limited restaurant license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive,
possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the
licensed premises or off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081. The
licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or
distributors, except for purchases made pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.
The license shall not authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages by the
package.
(3) The holder of a limited restaurant license shall maintain at least seventy percent
(70%) of its gross receipts from the sale of food and maintain the minimum
applicable seating requirement required for the type of limited restaurant license.
(4) A limited restaurant as defined by KRS 241.010(37)[(39)](a) shall:
(a) Only sell alcoholic beverages incidental to the sale of a meal; and
(b) Not have an open bar and shall not sell alcoholic beverages to any person who
has not purchased or does not purchase a meal.
(5) (a) The holder of a limited restaurant license may purchase alcoholic beverages
by the package from licensees authorized to sell distilled spirits, wine, and
malt beverages at retail, but only if those alcoholic beverages have first gone
through the three (3) tier system.
(b) Any purchase made pursuant to this subsection shall:
1. Only be sold by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or
off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081;
2. Be reported quarterly on a form prescribed by the department; and
3. Include a copy of each receipt of purchase.
(c) The holder of a limited restaurant license shall not purchase at retail more
Page 109 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
than:
1. Nine (9) liters of distilled spirits per month;
2. Nine (9) liters of wine per month; and
3. Three (3) cases of malt beverages per month.
Section 36. KRS 243.0341 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following local governments may
elect to act under this section:
(a) Any city or county that conducted an election under KRS 242.1244(2) prior to
January 1, 2016, for by the drink sales of alcoholic beverages in restaurants
and dining facilities seating one hundred (100) persons or more; or
(b) Any city with limited sale precincts created pursuant to KRS 242.1292 prior
to July 14, 2022.
(2) Upon a determination by the legislative body of a city or county that:
(a) An economic hardship exists within the city or county; and
(b) Expanded sales of alcoholic beverages by the drink could aid in economic
growth;
the city or county may, after conducting a public hearing that is noticed to the
public in accordance with the KRS Chapter 424, adopt an ordinance authorizing by
the drink sales of alcoholic beverages in restaurants and dining facilities containing
seating for at least fifty (50) persons and meeting the requirements of subsection (3)
of this section.
(3) The ordinance enacted by a city or county pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
shall authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages under the following limitations:
(a) Sales shall only be conducted in restaurants and other dining facilities meeting
the requirements of KRS 241.010(37)[(39)](a); and
(b) The provisions of KRS 243.034 shall apply to any restaurant or dining facility
operating under a license issued pursuant to this section.
Page 110 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(4) A city or county acting under this section may allow limited restaurant sales as
defined in KRS 241.010(37)[(39)].
(5) The enactment of an ordinance under this section shall not:
(a) Modify the city's or county's ability to issue a limited restaurant license to
restaurants or other dining facilities meeting the requirements of KRS
241.010(39)(b); or
(b) Affect, alter, or otherwise impair any license previously issued to a restaurant
or dining facility meeting the requirements of KRS 241.010(37)[(39)](b).
Section 37. KRS 243.040 is amended to read as follows:
The following kinds of malt beverage licenses may be issued by the malt beverages
administrator, the fees for which shall be:
(1) Brewer's license, per annum ........................................................................$2,580.00
(2) Microbrewery license, per annum ...................................................................$520.00
(3) Distributor's license, per annum ......................................................................$520.00
(4) Nonquota retail malt beverage package license, per annum ............................$210.00
(5) Out-of-state malt beverage supplier's license,
per annum ....................................................................................................$1,550.00
(6) Malt beverage storage license, per annum ......................................................$260.00
(7) Replacement or duplicate license, per annum ...................................................$25.00
(8) Limited out-of-state malt beverage supplier's license,
per annum .......................................................................................................$260.00
(9) Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license,
per annum .......................................................................................................$210.00
(10) Direct shipper[ Type A] license, per annum ....................................................$100.00
(11) The holder of a nonquota retail malt beverage package license may obtain a
Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50). The
holder of a Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license may obtain a nonquota
Page 111 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
retail malt beverage package license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50).
(12) A nonrefundable fee of sixty dollars ($60) shall be charged to process each new
transitional license pursuant to KRS 243.045.
(13) Other special licenses as the state board finds to be necessary for the administration
of KRS Chapters 241 to 244 and for the proper regulation and control of the
trafficking in malt beverages, as provided for by administrative regulations
promulgated by the state board.
A nonrefundable application fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be charged to process each
new application for a license under this section. The application fee shall be applied to
the licensing fee if the license is issued, or otherwise the fee shall be retained by the
department.
Section 38. KRS 243.075 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A city with a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the
most recent federal decennial census, a county that does not contain a city
with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based
upon the most recent federal decennial census, or a county that contains a city
authorized to impose a fee under subsection (9) of this section, that is wet
through a local option election held under KRS Chapter 242 is authorized to
impose a regulatory license fee not to exceed five percent (5%) upon the gross
receipts of the sale of alcoholic beverages[ and cannabis-infused beverages] of
each establishment located in the city or county licensed to sell alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages].
(b) The regulatory license fee may be levied at the beginning of each budget
period at a percentage rate that is reasonably estimated to fully reimburse the
local government for the estimated costs of any additional policing,
regulatory, or administrative expenses related to the sale of alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] in the city and county.
Page 112 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(c) The regulatory license fee shall be in addition to any other taxes, fees, or
licenses permitted by law, except:
1. A credit against a regulatory license fee shall be allowed in an amount
equal to any licenses or fees imposed by the city or county pursuant to
KRS 243.060 or 243.070; and
2. In a county in which the city and county both levy a regulatory license
fee, the county license fee shall only be applicable outside the
jurisdictional boundaries of those cities which levy a license fee.
(2) (a) A city or county that is moist through a local option election held under KRS
242.1244 may by ordinance impose a regulatory license fee upon the gross
receipts of the sale of alcoholic beverages of each establishment located in the
city or county and licensed to sell alcoholic beverages by the drink for
consumption on the premises.
(b) The regulatory license fee may be levied annually at a rate that is reasonably
estimated to fully reimburse the city or county for the estimated costs for any
additional policing, regulatory, or administrative related expenses.
(c) The regulatory license fee shall be in addition to any other taxes, fees, or
licenses permitted by law, but a credit against the fee shall be allowed in an
amount equal to any licenses or fees imposed by the city or county pursuant to
KRS 243.060 or 243.070.
(d) In a county in which the city and county both levy a regulatory license fee, the
county license fee shall only be applicable outside the jurisdictional
boundaries of those cities which levy a license fee.
(3) (a) For any election held after July 15, 2014, any new fee authorized under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be enacted by the city or county no
later than two (2) years from the date of the local option election held under
KRS Chapter 242.
Page 113 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, any city or county that held
a local option election between July 15, 2014, and July 15, 2018, may enact a
regulatory licensing fee in accordance with subsection (1) of this section
within two (2) years of June 29, 2021.
(4) After July 15, 2014, any fee authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall be established at a rate that will generate revenue that does not exceed the total
of the reasonable expenses actually incurred by the city or county in the
immediately previous fiscal year for the additional cost, as demonstrated by
reasonable evidence, of:
(a) Policing;
(b) Regulation; and
(c) Administration;
as a result of the sale of alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] within
the city or county.
(5) (a) The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall promulgate administrative
regulations which set forth the process by which a city or county, in the first
year following the discontinuance of prohibition, may estimate any additional
policing, regulation, and administrative expenses by a city or county directly
and solely related to the discontinuance of prohibition. This subsection shall
apply to any discontinuance of prohibition occurring after the promulgation of
administrative regulations required by this subsection.
(b) After the first year, the regulatory license fee for each subsequent year shall
conform to the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The revenue received from the imposition of the regulatory license fee authorized
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be:
(a) Deposited into a segregated fund of the city or county;
(b) Spent only in accordance with the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of
Page 114 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
this section; and
(c) Audited under an annual audit performed pursuant to KRS 43.070, 64.810,
and 91A.040.
(7) Any city or county found by a court to have violated the provisions of this section
shall:
(a) Provide a refund as determined by the court to any licensee that has been
harmed in an amount equal to its prorated portion of the excess revenues
collected by the city or county that are directly attributable to a violation
occurring after July 15, 2014;
(b) Be responsible for the payment of the reasonable attorney fees directly
incurred by a party to a litigation in an amount ordered by the court upon its
finding of an intentional and willful violation of this section by a city or
county occurring after July 15, 2014; and
(c) Upon the finding by a court of a second intentional and willful violation of the
provisions of this section, lose the ability to impose the regulatory fee
provided by this section for a period of five (5) years and, upon the finding by
a court of a third intentional and willful violation, forfeit the right to impose
the regulatory license fee authorized by this section.
(8) Any party bringing suit against a city or county for an alleged violation of this
section occurring after July 15, 2014, shall be responsible for the payment of the
reasonable attorney fees of the city or county in an amount determined by the court
upon a finding by the court that the city or county did not violate this section.
(9) (a) Any city that does not meet the population requirements of subsection (1) of
this section, and any county that has a city exceeding the population
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, that imposed a regulatory
license fee pursuant to this section as of January 1, 2019, shall be deemed to
meet the requirements for doing so set out in this section and may continue to
Page 115 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
impose the regulatory license fee previously established pursuant to this
section.
(b) Any city or county that is authorized to impose the regulatory license fee
under subsection (1) of this section, or under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
that imposed the regulatory license fee at a rate higher than five percent (5%)
prior to June 27, 2019, may continue to impose the regulatory license fee at a
rate that exceeds five percent (5%). The rate shall continue to be calculated
annually pursuant to the requirements of this section and shall not exceed the
rate that was imposed by the city or county on January 1, 2019.
(10) A direct shipper licensee shall be subject to and remit the regulatory license fee
imposed by this section as though it were an establishment located in a city or
county licensed to sell alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages]. This
fee shall be considered a tax as defined in KRS 243.029.
(11) Any city or county imposing a regulatory license fee under this section shall file
with the department a report showing the applicable fee amount and remittance
address for each affected license type in its jurisdiction on or before August 1,
2020. Any adoption of this fee after July 15, 2020, or modification of the applicable
fee amount or remittance address for each affected licensee shall be reported to the
department within thirty (30) days of adoption by the city or county imposing the
fee. Within twenty (20) days after receipt of the information, the department shall
compile and publish the information so that it is readily available to the public.
Section 39. KRS 243.0811 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person delivering alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] by the
package at retail on behalf of a licensee shall not sell to:
(a) A minor under twenty-one (21) years of age; or
(b) An intoxicated person.
(2) Any person delivering alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] on
Page 116 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
behalf of a retail package licensee[ or cannabis-infused beverage retail licensee] to
an individual consumer shall verify that the recipient is at least twenty-one (21)
years of age by requiring the production of a valid identification document as
defined in KRS 241.010.
(3) Any person delivering alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] by the
package at retail on behalf of a licensee shall possess a physical or electronic
version of the license issued by the department.
Section 40. KRS 243.100 is amended to read as follows:
An individual shall not become a licensee if the individual:
(1) (a) Has been convicted of any felony until five (5) years have passed from the
date of conviction, release from custody or incarceration, parole, or
termination of probation, whichever is later;
(b) Has been convicted of any misdemeanor involving a controlled substance that
is described in or classified pursuant to KRS Chapter 218A in the two (2)
years immediately preceding the application;
(c) Has been convicted of any misdemeanor directly or indirectly attributable to
the use of alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] in the two (2)
years immediately preceding the application;
(d) Is under the age of twenty-one (21) years; or
(e) Has had any license relating to the regulation of the manufacture, sale, and
transportation of alcoholic beverages[ or the regulation of the sale,
distribution, or transportation of cannabis-infused beverages] revoked for
cause or has been convicted of a violation of any statute within KRS Chapters
241 to 244, until the expiration of two (2) years from the date of the
revocation or conviction.
(2) A partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, corporation,
governmental agency, or other business entity recognized by law shall not be
Page 117 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
licensed if:
(a) Each principal owner, partner, member, officer, and director does not qualify
under subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section;
(b) It has had any license relating to the regulation of the manufacture, sale, and
transportation of alcoholic beverages[ or the regulation of the sale,
distribution, or transportation of cannabis-infused beverages] revoked for
cause or has been convicted of a violation of any statute within KRS Chapters
241 to 244, until the expiration of two (2) years from the date of the
revocation or conviction; or
(c) Any principal owner, partner, member, officer, or director, or any business
entity in which they were directly or indirectly interested, has had any license
revoked for cause or has been convicted of a violation of any statute within
KRS Chapters 241 to 244, until the expiration of the later of two (2) years
from the date of the revocation or two (2) years from the date of conviction.
(3) The provisions of subsection (1)(a) and (b) shall apply to anyone applying for a new
license under this chapter after July 15, 1998, but shall not apply to those who
renew a license that was originally issued prior to July 15, 1998, or an application
for a supplemental license where the original license was issued prior to July 15,
1998.
(4) A person shall not evade license disqualification by applying for a license through
or under the name of a different person. The state administrators shall examine the
ownership, membership, and management of all license applicants, and shall deny
the application if a disqualified person has a direct or indirect interest in the
applicant's business. The department may issue administrative subpoenas and
summonses to determine ownership of an applicant or to investigate alleged
violations by a licensee.
(5) A direct shipper license applicant shall be exempt from the requirements of this
Page 118 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
section, and shall instead follow the requirements set forth in KRS 243.027.
Section 41. KRS 243.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each kind of license listed in
KRS 243.030 shall be incompatible with every other kind listed in that section and
a[no] person or entity holding a license of any of those kinds shall not apply for or
hold a license of another kind listed in KRS 243.030.
(2) (a) Each kind of license listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4) shall be
incompatible with every other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4), and
a[no] person holding a license of any of those kinds shall not apply for or
hold a license of any other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4).
(b) A brewery holding a license listed in KRS 243.040(5) or (8) shall not apply
for or hold a license listed in KRS 243.040(3) or (4).
(3) (a) The holder of a quota retail package license may also hold a quota retail drink
license, an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3 retail
drink license[, a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license], or a
special nonbeverage alcohol license.
(b) The holder of a transporter's license may also hold a distilled spirits and wine
storage license.
(c) The holder of a distiller's license may also hold a rectifier's license, a special
nonbeverage alcohol license, a winery license, or a small farm winery license.
(d) A commercial airline system or charter flight system retail license, a
commercial airline system or charter flight system transporter's license, and a
retail drink license if held by a commercial airline or charter flight system
may be held by the same licensee.
(e) A Sunday retail drink license, vintage distilled spirits license, and
supplemental license may be held by the holder of a primary license.
(f) The holder of a distiller's, winery, small farm winery, brewer, microbrewery,
Page 119 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
distilled spirits and wine supplier's, or malt beverage supplier's license may
also hold a direct shipper license.
(g) The holder of an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an
NQ3 retail drink license, a quota retail drink license, or a limited restaurant
license may also hold a limited nonquota package license.
(4)[ (a) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license shall not
apply for or hold the license listed in KRS 243.030(5) or 243.040(3).
(b) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license shall also
hold a quota retail package license.
(c) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license may hold it as
a primary license or as a supplemental license to a distributor's license or a
wholesaler's license.
(5)] Any person may hold two (2) or more licenses of the same kind.
(5)[(6)] A person or entity shall not evade the prohibition against applying for or
holding licenses of two (2) kinds by applying for a second license through or under
the name of a different person or entity. The state administrator shall examine the
ownership, membership, and management of applicants, and shall deny the
application for a license if the applicant is substantially interested in a person or
entity that holds an incompatible license.
Section 42. KRS 243.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A transporter's license may be issued as a primary license to a motor carrier
authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth by the Transportation Cabinet
or the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration or to another person engaged in
business as a common carrier. A person holding a transporter's license may
transport alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] to or from the
licensed premises of any licensee under this chapter to an individual consumer if
both the consignor and consignee in each case are authorized by the law of the
Page 120 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
states of their residence to sell, purchase, deliver, ship, or receive the alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages].
(2) (a) A transporter may deliver or ship to consumers over twenty-one (21) years of
age in packages clearly marked [either, as appropriate:
1. ]"Alcoholic Beverages, adult signature (21 years of age or over) required"[; or
2. "Cannabis-infused Beverages, adult signature (21 years of age or over) required";]
and shall request adult-signature-only service from the carrier.
(b) Deliveries or shipments of alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused
beverages] shall only be made into areas of the state in which alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] may be lawfully sold. When the
shipper requests adult-signature-only service, it shall be a violation for a
common carrier not to inspect government-issued identification for proof of
age. A[No] properly licensed common carrier or any of its employees acting
on behalf of a consignor in the course and scope of a delivery or shipment of
alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] to a consumer shall not
be liable for a violation of this subsection or any provision of KRS 242.250,
242.260, or 242.270 prohibiting the delivery or shipment of alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] into areas of the state in which
alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] are not lawfully sold.
(3) Except for a common carrier that has been assigned a USDOT number issued by the
Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, the holder of a transporter's license
shall cause each truck or vehicle to display the name of the licensee and the state
license numbers in a manner prescribed by an administrative regulation
promulgated by the board.
(4) Except for an application by a common carrier that has been assigned a USDOT
number issued by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, an application
for a transporter's license shall include a statement that the applicant, if issued a
Page 121 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
license, shall allow any authorized investigators of the department to stop and
examine the cargo of any truck or vehicle in which alcoholic beverages[ or
cannabis-infused beverages] are being transported within the boundaries of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(5) A licensee may move, within the same county, alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-
infused beverages] from one (1) of the licensee's licensed premises to another
without a transporter's license. A licensee may move alcoholic beverages[ or
cannabis-infused beverages] from one (1) of the licensee's licensed premises
located in one (1) county to a licensed premises located in another county, without a
transporter's license, with prior written approval of the administrator for good cause
shown. The licensee shall keep and maintain, in one (1) of its licensed premises,
adequate books and records of the transactions involved in transporting alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] from one (1) licensed premises to
another in accordance with standards established in administrative regulations
promulgated by the board. The records shall be available to the department and the
Department of Revenue upon request.
(6) Distilled spirits and wine may be transported by any licensed retailer selling
distilled spirits or wine, by the package or by the drink, from the premises of a
licensed wholesaler to the licensed premises of the retail licensee. Both the
wholesaler and the retailer engaging in activity under this subsection shall be
responsible for maintaining records documenting the transactions.
Section 43. KRS 243.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Applications for distilled spirit and wine licenses[ or for cannabis-infused beverage
licenses] shall be made to the distilled spirits administrator. Applications for malt
beverage licenses shall be made to the malt beverages administrator. Applications
for distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverage licenses shall be made to the distilled
spirits administrator and to the malt beverages administrator.
Page 122 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(2) All applications shall be on forms furnished by the department. They shall be
verified and shall set forth in detail all information concerning the applicant and the
premises submitted for licensing as the board requires through the promulgation of
an administrative regulation. Each application shall be accompanied by payment.
Payment of the license fee may be by certified check, a postal or express money
order, or any other method of payment approved in writing by both the Finance and
Administration Cabinet and the Office of the State Treasurer. Promptly upon receipt
of the payment the board shall pay it into the State Treasury, giving the Department
of Revenue copies of the pay-in vouchers and any other supporting data as the
Department of Revenue requires for revenue control purposes.
(3) (a) A business entity that owns more than two (2) licensed premises may initially
submit common information about ownership, officers, directors, managerial
employees, and shall provide current criminal background checks once for all
separately licensed premises in one (1) master file.
(b) Any business qualifying under this subsection shall only be required to amend
its master file information for material changes under KRS 243.390(2) or
ownership transfers under KRS 243.630.
(c) A direct shipper license applicant shall be exempt from the requirements of
this subsection and shall instead meet the requirements for its license type as
set forth in KRS 243.027.
Section 44. KRS 243.390 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may require through the promulgation of an administrative regulation
that license applications contain the following information, given under oath:
(a) The name, age, Social Security number, address, residence, and citizenship of
each applicant;
(b) If the applicant is a partner, the name, age, Social Security number, address,
residence, and citizenship of each partner and the name and address of the
Page 123 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
partnership;
(c) The name, age, Social Security number, address, residence, and citizenship of
each individual or partner interested in the business for which the license is
sought, together with the nature of that interest, and, if the applicant is a
corporation, limited partnership company, limited liability company, or other
business entity recognized by law, the name, age, Social Security number, and
address of each principal owner, member, officer, and director of the
applicant. The department may require the names of all owners and the
ownership percentage held by each;
(d) The premises to be licensed, stating the street and number, if the premises has
a street number, and a description that will reasonably indicate the location of
the premises;
(e) 1. A statement that neither the applicant nor any other person referred to in
this section has been convicted of:
a. Any misdemeanor directly or indirectly attributable to alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages];
b. Any violation involving a controlled substance that is described in
or classified pursuant to KRS Chapter 218A within the two (2)
years immediately preceding the application;
c. Any felony, within five (5) years from the later of the date of
parole or the date of conviction; or
d. Providing false information to the department preceding the
application; and
2. A statement that the applicant or any other person referred to in this
section has not had any license that has been issued under KRS Chapters
241 to 244 revoked for cause within two (2) years prior to the date of the
application;
Page 124 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(f) A statement that the applicant will in good faith abide by every state and local
statute, regulation, and ordinance relating to the manufacture, sale, use of, and
trafficking in alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages]; and
(g) Any other information necessary for the department to administer KRS
Chapters 241 to 244.
(2) If, after a license has been issued, there is a change in any of the facts required to be
set forth in the application, a verified supplemental statement in writing giving
notice of the change shall be filed with the department within ten (10) days after the
change.
(3) In giving any notice or taking any action in reference to a license, the department
may rely upon the information furnished in the application or in the supplemental
statement connected with the application. This information, as against the licensee
or applicant, shall be conclusively presumed to be correct. The information required
to be furnished in the application or supplemental statement shall be deemed
material in any prosecution for perjury.
(4) A direct shipper license applicant shall be exempt from the requirements of this
section and shall instead meet the requirements for its license type as set forth in
KRS 243.027.
Section 45. KRS 243.480 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon proceedings for the revocation of any license under KRS 243.520, the
Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, or the local administrator, may in its or his or
her discretion order a suspension of the license for any cause for which it may, but
is not required to, revoke the license under the provisions of KRS 243.490 and
243.500. However, the licensee may have the alternative, subject to the approval of
the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board or the local administrator, to pay in lieu of
part or all of the days of any suspension period, a sum as follows:
(a) Except for violations arising from retail sales activities, including sales under
Page 125 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
licenses issued pursuant to KRS 243.086 and sales at retail under KRS
243.0305:
1. Distillers, rectifiers, wineries, and brewers, one thousand dollars
($1,000) per day;
2. Wholesale distilled spirits and wine licensees, four hundred dollars
($400) per day; and
3. Wholesale malt beverage licensees, four hundred dollars ($400) per
day[; and
4. Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license, four hundred dollars
($400) per day];
(b) 1. Retail licensees authorized to sell distilled spirits, wine, or malt
beverages by the package or drink, fifty dollars ($50) per day; and
2. Distillers, wineries, and brewers for violations arising from their retail
sales activities, including sales by distillers under licenses issued
pursuant to KRS 243.086 and sales at retail under KRS 243.0305, fifty
dollars ($50) per day; and
(c)[ Cannabis-infused beverage retail package licenses, fifty dollars ($50) per day;
and
(d)] All remaining licensees, fifty dollars ($50) per day.
(2) Payments in lieu of suspension or for board-ordered agency server training,
collected on a cost recovery basis, collected by the Alcoholic Beverage Control
Board shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the general
expenditure fund. Payments in lieu of suspension collected by local administrators
shall be deposited and used as local alcoholic beverage license tax receipts are
deposited and used.
(3) In addition to or in lieu of a suspension of a license, the board may order a licensee
to pay for and require attendance and completion by some or all of the licensee's
Page 126 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
alcoholic beverage servers in the department's server training program.
(4) Appeals from orders of suspension and the procedure thereon shall be the same as
are provided for orders of revocation in KRS Chapter 13B[.
(5) The portions of this section relating to local administrators shall not apply to
cannabis-infused beverage licensees].
Section 46. KRS 243.490 is amended to read as follows:
A license may be revoked or suspended by the board for a violation of any of the
following:
(1) Any of the provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244;
(2) Any administrative regulation of the board relating to the regulation of the [:
(a) ]manufacture, sale, and transportation of alcoholic beverages[; or
(b) Distribution and retail sale of cannabis-infused beverages];
(3) Any rule or administrative regulation of the Department of Revenue relating to the
taxation of alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages];
(4) Any Act of Congress or any rule or regulation of any federal board, agency, or
commission;
(5) Any local ordinance relating to the regulation of the [:
(a) ]manufacture, sale, and transportation or taxation of alcoholic beverages[; or
(b) Distribution, retail sale, or taxation of cannabis-infused beverages];
(6) Any of the laws, regulations, or ordinances referred to in this section when an
agent, servant, or employee of the licensee committed the violation, irrespective of
whether the licensee knew of or permitted the violation or whether the violation
was committed in disobedience of the licensee's instructions;
(7) Any cause which the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board in the exercise of its sound
discretion deems sufficient; or
(8) Any of the reasons for which the state administrator would have been required to
deny a license if existing material facts had been known.
Page 127 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
Section 47. KRS 243.500 is amended to read as follows:
Any license may be revoked or suspended for the following causes:
(1) Conviction of the licensee or the licensee's agent, servant, or employee for selling
any illegal alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] on the licensed
premises.
(2) Making any false, material statements in an application or renewal application for a
license or supplemental license.
(3) Conviction of the licensee or any of the licensee's agents, servants, or employees of:
(a) Two (2) violations of the terms and provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244,
or any act regulating the manufacture, sale, and transportation of alcoholic
beverages[ or the sale, distribution, or transportation of cannabis-infused
beverages] within two (2) consecutive years;
(b) Two (2) misdemeanors directly or indirectly attributable to the use of
alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] within two (2)
consecutive years; or
(c) Any felony.
(4) Failure or default of a licensee to pay an excise tax or any part of the tax or any
penalties imposed by or under the provisions of any statutes, ordinances, or Acts of
Congress relative to taxation, or for a violation of any related administrative
regulations promulgated by the Department of Revenue.
(5)[ (a)] Revocation of any license or permit provided in KRS 243.060, 243.070,
243.600, and 243.610, or granted under any Act of Congress relative to the
regulation of the manufacture, sale, and transportation of alcoholic beverages.
[(b) Revocation of any license established under KRS 243.200, 243.403, or
243.405 relative to the sale, distribution, or transportation of cannabis-infused
beverages.]
(6) Setting up, conducting, operating, or keeping, on the licensed premises, any
Page 128 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
gambling game, device, machine, contrivance, lottery, gift enterprise, handbook, or
facility for betting or transmitting bets on horse races; or permitting to be set up,
conducted, operated, kept, or engaged in, on the licensed premises, any gambling
game, device, machine, contrivance, lottery, gift enterprise, handbook, or facility.
This subsection shall not apply to:
(a) The sale of lottery tickets sold under the provisions of KRS Chapter 154A;
(b) The operation of a pari-mutuel system for betting, or the operation of sports
wagering, where authorized by law;
(c) The conduct of charitable gaming by a charitable organization licensed or
permitted under KRS Chapters 230 and 238; or
(d) Special temporary raffles of alcoholic beverages under KRS 243.036.
(7) Conviction of the licensee, the licensee's agents, servants, or employees for:
(a) The trafficking or possession upon the licensed premises of controlled or
illegal substances described in KRS Chapter 218A, including synthetic drugs;
(b) Knowingly permitting the trafficking or possession by patrons upon the
licensed premises of controlled or illegal substances described in KRS
Chapter 218A, including synthetic drugs; or
(c) Knowingly receiving stolen property upon the licensed premises.
(8) Failure to comply with the terms of a final order of the board.
Section 48. KRS 243.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section shall apply to any licensee who is unable to continue
in business at the licensed premises because of:
(a) An act of God;
(b) A casualty;
(c) An acquisition by a federal, state, city, or other governmental agency under
the power of eminent domain granted to the government or agency;
(d) A voluntary or involuntary acquisition by any corporation or other business
Page 129 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
entity recognized by law through the power of eminent domain;
(e) A loss of lease because the landlord fails to renew an existing lease;
(f) Court action;
(g) Default under a security agreement;
(h) Default under a lease; or
(i) Other verifiable business reason.
(2) If a license issued by the department has been revoked, the former licensee may,
under the supervision of the state administrator, dispose of and transfer the former
licensee's stock to another licensee if the disposition is completed within ninety (90)
days and the licensee is a distiller, rectifier, winery, or brewer. The disposition shall
be completed within thirty (30) days if the licensee is a wholesaler or distributor or
within twenty (20) days if the licensee is a retailer.
(3) A retail licensee in good standing with the department who voluntarily ceases to
operate the licensed business for any reason other than revocation by the board or a
court order shall dispose of all alcoholic beverage[ or cannabis-infused beverage]
inventory within thirty (30) days of the event. The following requirements shall
apply to the disposition of the licensee's inventory:
(a) If the premises is still open to the public and the licensee has not yet
surrendered the license, the licensee shall sell alcoholic beverages[ or
cannabis-infused beverages] only to the public and shall not sell below costs;
(b) If a licensee has terminated the licensed business, the licensee shall submit a
written request for approval from the state administrator within ten (10) days
in advance of the sale to dispose of the licensee's remaining inventory. The
request shall identify the retailer who is purchasing the inventory, the
proposed date of the sale, and the quantity, types, and brands of alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] to be sold; and
(c) If a licensee has more than one (1) licensed retail premises and closes one (1)
Page 130 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
or more retail premises and seeks to transfer the inventory to another licensed
retail premises the licensee owns, the licensee shall submit a request in
writing to the state administrator at least ten (10) days before the inventory is
transferred. The request shall identify the premises to which the alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] are being transferred, the proposed
date of the transfer, and the quantity, types, and brands of alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] to be sold.
(4) If a licensee files for bankruptcy or is directed by a court to dispose of inventory to
satisfy a lien or judgment, the inventory may be sold only to a licensee holding any
license that authorizes the possession and sale of those alcoholic beverages[ or
cannabis-infused beverages]. The bankrupt licensee or the licensee subject to the
court order shall notify the department of the sale and shall attach a copy of the
court order or the judgment directing the sale and a list of the quantity, types, and
brands of alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] to be sold, but if the
licensee fails to do so, the notification may be made by the bankruptcy trustee, the
lienholder, or the judgment creditor. Any licensee who purchases the inventory
shall notify the department within five (5) days after the transfer of the specific
inventory sold.
(5) A secured creditor or landlord that is in possession, custody, or control of any
alcoholic beverages owned by a licensee may dispose of those alcoholic beverages
through the department's public auction as authorized by subsection (6) of this
section or may dispose of alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] in
the following manner:
(a) The secured creditor or landlord shall submit a written request for approval
from the state administrator, within twenty (20) days in advance of the sale or
destruction of the licensee's remaining inventory. The request shall identify
the:
Page 131 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
1. Licensee who is purchasing the inventory or the business to destroy the
inventory;
2. Proposed date of the sale or destruction; and
3. Quantity, types, and brands of alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused
beverages] to be sold or destroyed;
(b) The proposed transferee or transferees may be any person or persons holding
any license that authorizes the possession and sale of those alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages], or a business authorized to dispose
of alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages];
(c) A copy of the written request shall be mailed by the department to the
licensee's registered agent or last known address on file with the department
by certified mail. Within ten (10) days after the department's mailing of this
request, the licensee shall file with the department and applicant any objection
the licensee has to the request, or be permanently barred from objecting; and
(d) If a sale is approved, the licensee who purchases the inventory shall notify the
department within five (5) days after the transfer of that specific inventory.
(6) The board may promulgate administrative regulations for additional means for the
transfer or disposal of alcoholic beverage inventory, including procedures to allow
the board to dispose of the inventory through public auction if:
(a) A final order relating to those alcoholic beverages has been entered after all
administrative and judicial proceedings are conducted, if applicable;
(b) The entire proceeds of the public auction are donated to the alcohol wellness
and responsibility education fund established in KRS 211.285; and
(c) The board deems the inventory safe to release to the public, including but not
limited to the alcoholic beverages being in their original, unopened packaging.
Section 49. KRS 243.720 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) There is levied upon the use, sale, or distribution by sale or gift of distilled
Page 132 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
spirits a tax of one dollar and ninety-two cents ($1.92) on each wine gallon of
distilled spirits, and a proportional rate per gallon on all distilled spirits used,
sold, or distributed in any container of more or less than one (1) gallon, but
the rate of the excise tax on spirits in retail containers of one-half (1/2) pint
shall be twelve cents ($0.12); and
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, distilled
spirits placed in containers for sale at retail, where the distilled spirits
represent six percent (6%) or less of the total volume of the contents of the
containers, shall be taxed at the rate of twenty-five cents ($0.25) per gallon.
(2) There is levied upon the use, sale, or distribution by sale or gift of wine, a tax of
fifty cents ($0.50) on each gallon of wine, and a proportional rate per gallon on the
wine used, sold, or distributed in any container of more or less than one (1) gallon,
but the tax shall not be less than four cents ($0.04) on the sale or distribution of any
retail container of wine.
(3) (a) There is levied upon the sale or distribution by sale or gift of malt beverages
an excise tax of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) on each barrel of thirty-one
(31) gallons and a proportional rate per gallon on malt beverages sold or
distributed in any container of more or less than thirty-one (31) gallons;
(b) Each brewer producing malt beverages in this state shall be entitled to a credit
of fifty percent (50%) of the tax levied on each barrel of malt beverages sold
in this state, up to three hundred thousand (300,000) barrels per annum.
(4)[ There is levied upon the use, sale, or distribution by sale or gift of cannabis-infused
beverages a tax of one dollar and ninety-two cents ($1.92) on each gallon of a
cannabis-infused beverage, and a proportional rate per gallon on all cannabis-
infused beverages used, sold, or distributed in any container of more or less than
one (1) gallon.
(5)] This section shall not apply to:
Page 133 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(a) Wine manufactured, sold, given away, or distributed and used solely for
sacramental purposes; or
(b) Distilled spirits and wine purchased by holders of special licenses provided
for in KRS 243.320 and purchased and used in the manner authorized by
those licenses.
Section 50. KRS 243.730 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Wholesalers of distilled spirits and wine shall pay and report the tax levied by
KRS 243.720(1) and (2) on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month
next succeeding the month in which possession or title of the distilled spirits
and wine is transferred from the wholesaler to retailers or consumers in this
state, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated under KRS
Chapter 13A designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the
Commonwealth.
(b) 1. Distributors or retailers of malt beverages, who purchase malt beverages
directly from a brewer, shall pay and report the tax levied by KRS
243.720(3) on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month next
succeeding the month in which the brewer sells, transfers, or passes title
of the malt beverage to the distributor or retailer, in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A
designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.
2. The credit allowed brewers in this state, under the provisions of KRS
243.720(3)(b), shall flow through to the distributor or retailer who
purchases malt beverages directly from the brewer.
3. If a brewer sells, transfers, or passes title to malt beverages to any of its
employees for home consumption or to any charitable or fraternal
organization pursuant to the provisions of KRS 243.150, the brewer
shall be responsible for paying and reporting the tax levied by KRS
Page 134 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
243.720(3) in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (d) of this
subsection.
(c)[ Cannabis-infused beverage distributors shall pay and report the tax levied by
KRS 243.720(4) on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month next
succeeding the month in which possession or title of the cannabis-infused
beverages are transferred from the cannabis-infused beverage distributor to
retailers or consumers in this state, in accordance with administrative
regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A designed reasonably to
protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.
(d)] 1. Every brewer selling, transferring, or passing title to malt beverages to
any person in this state other than a distributor or retailer; and
2.[ Every manufacturer of cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the
Department for Public Health selling, transferring, or passing title to
cannabis-infused beverages to any person in this state other than a
distributor or retailer; and
3.] Every other person selling, transferring, or passing title of distilled
spirits, wine, or malt beverages[, or cannabis-infused beverages] to
distributors, retailers[, cannabis-infused beverage licensees], or
consumers;
shall report and pay the tax levied by KRS 243.720 on or before the twentieth
day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which possession or
title of distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages[, or cannabis-infused
beverages] is transferred to a distributor, retailer[, cannabis-infused beverage
licensee], or consumer in this state, in accordance with administrative
regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A designed reasonably to
protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.
(e) Every distributor, retailer, or consumer possessing, using, selling, or
Page 135 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
distributing distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages[, or cannabis-infused
beverages] in this state upon which the tax levied by KRS 243.720 and
243.884 has not been paid shall be jointly and severally liable for reporting
and paying the tax due, in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A designed reasonably to protect the
revenues of the Commonwealth. The liability shall not be extinguished until
the tax has been paid to the Department of Revenue.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, every
owner of a small farm winery shall pay and report the tax levied by KRS
243.720 (1) and (2) on a quarterly basis, in accordance with administrative
regulations of the Department of Revenue designed reasonably to protect the
revenues of the Commonwealth.
(2) Every wholesaler of distilled spirits or wine before using, selling, or distributing by
sale or gift distilled spirits and wine shall register with the Department of Revenue.
(3) Every brewer before selling or distributing by sale or gift malt beverages, or before
importing malt beverages into the state, shall register with the Department of
Revenue in a manner as the Department of Revenue may require[.
(4) Every manufacturer of cannabis-infused beverages before selling or
distributing by sale or gift cannabis-infused beverages, or before importing
cannabis-infused beverages into the state, shall:
(a) Obtain a permit as a food manufacturer through the Department for Public
Health; and
(b) Register with the Department of Revenue in a manner as the Department of
Revenue may require].
Section 51. KRS 243.790 is amended to read as follows:
The sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages]
manufactured in or imported into this state for shipment permanently out of the state to
Page 136 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
be sold without the state and consumed without the state shall not be subject to the tax
imposed by KRS 243.720. Provided, however, the Department of Revenue may, when
necessary for the purpose of control enforcement or protection of revenue, prescribe the
conditions under which containers of the alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused
beverages] for shipment permanently out of the state to be sold without the state and
consumed without the state may be kept and trafficked in without payment of the tax.
Section 52. KRS 243.850 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of assisting in the enforcement of KRS 243.720, 243.730, 243.790,
and 243.884, every licensee, except retailers, whether subject to the payment of
taxes imposed by KRS 243.720, 243.730, 243.790, and 243.884, shall, on or before
the twentieth day of each month, render to the Department of Revenue a statement,
in writing, of all trafficking in alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages]
during the preceding month.
(2) The statement shall:
(a) Be taken directly from the records of the reporting licensee[ or manufacturer
of cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the Department for Public
Health], and shall set forth on forms furnished by the Department of Revenue
the required information; and
(b) Include alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] destined for sale
outside the state, as well as alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused
beverages] subject to the tax imposed by KRS 243.720, 243.730, 243.790, and
243.884.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall have authority to require from retail licensees
and[,] other licensees[, and manufacturers of cannabis-infused beverages] other
reports and statements at the necessary times for the enforcement of KRS 243.720,
243.730, 243.790, and 243.884.
Section 53. KRS 243.884 is amended to read as follows:
Page 137 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(1) (a) For the privilege of making "wholesale sales" or "sales at wholesale" of malt
beverages, wine, or distilled spirits[, or cannabis-infused beverages], a tax is
hereby imposed upon all wholesalers of wine and distilled spirits, all
distributors of malt beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages], all direct
shipper licensees shipping alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused
beverages] to a consumer at a Kentucky address, all distillers making sales
pursuant to KRS 243.0305(3), (4)(a)1. and 2. and (c), (7), (9), (10), (12), and
(13), all microbreweries selling malt beverages under KRS 243.157, and all
small farm wineries selling wine under KRS 243.155[, and all manufacturers
of cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the Department for Public
Health].
(b) Prior to July 1, 2015, the tax shall be imposed at the rate of eleven percent
(11%) of the gross receipts of any wholesaler or distributor derived from
"sales at wholesale" or "wholesale sales" made within the Commonwealth,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. For the purposes of this
section, the gross receipts of a microbrewery making "wholesale sales" shall
be calculated by determining the dollar value amount that the microbrewer
would have collected had it conveyed to a distributor the same volume sold to
a consumer as allowed under KRS 243.157(3)(b) and (c).
(c) The following rates shall apply to wholesale sales or sales at wholesale:
1. For distilled spirits[ and cannabis-infused beverages], eleven percent
(11%); and
2. For wine and malt beverages, ten percent (10%).
(d) The following rates shall apply for direct shipper sales:
1. For distilled spirits[ and cannabis-infused beverages shipments], eleven
percent (11%) for wholesale sales or sales at wholesale; and
2. For wine and malt beverage shipments, ten percent (10%) for wholesale
Page 138 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
sales or sales at wholesale.
(e) For direct shipper sales or sales made pursuant to KRS 243.0305, if a
wholesale price is not readily available, the direct shipper licensee or distillery
shall calculate the wholesale price to be seventy percent (70%) of the retail
price of the alcoholic beverages.
(2) Wholesalers of distilled spirits and wine, distributors of malt beverages[ or
cannabis-infused beverages], microbreweries, distillers[, manufacturers of
cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the Department for Public Health], and
direct shipper licensees shall pay and report the tax levied by this section on or
before the twentieth day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which
possession or title of the distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages[, or cannabis-
infused beverages] is transferred from the wholesaler or distributor to retailers, or
by microbreweries, distillers[, manufacturers of cannabis-infused beverages
permitted by the Department for Public Health], or direct shipper licensees to
consumers in this state, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated
under KRS Chapter 13A designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the
Commonwealth.
(3) Gross receipts from sales at wholesale or wholesale sales shall not include the
following sales:
(a) Sales made between wholesalers or[,] between distributors[, or between
manufacturers of cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the Department for
Public Health];
(b) Sales from the first fifty thousand (50,000) gallons of wine produced by a
small farm winery in a calendar year made by:
1. The small farm winery; or
2. A wholesaler of that wine produced by the small farm winery; and
(c) Sales made between a direct shipper licensee and a consumer located outside
Page 139 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
of Kentucky.
Section 54. KRS 244.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] licensee shall not purchase or agree to purchase any alcoholic beverages[ or
cannabis-infused beverages] from any person within or without this state, who is
not licensed to sell the beverages to the particular purchaser at the time of the
agreement to sell, nor give any order for any alcoholic beverages to any person who
is not a holder of a special agent's or solicitor's license if this license is required.
(2) A[No] licensee shall not sell or agree to sell any alcoholic beverage[ or cannabis-
infused beverage] to any person within or without this state who is not legally
authorized to buy and receive the beverages at the time of the agreement to sell, nor
secure any order for the sale of any alcoholic beverages through any person who is
not the holder of a special agent's or solicitor's license.
Section 55. KRS 244.080 is amended to read as follows:
A retail licensee, or the licensee's agent, servant, or employee, shall not sell, give away,
or deliver any alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages], or procure or permit
any alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] to be sold, given away,
possessed by, or delivered to:
(1) A minor, except that in any prosecution for selling alcoholic beverages[ or
cannabis-infused beverages] to a minor it shall be an affirmative defense that the
sale was induced by the use of false, fraudulent, or altered identification papers or
other documents and that the appearance and character of the purchaser were such
that the purchaser's age could not have been ascertained by any other means and
that the purchaser's appearance and character indicated strongly that the purchaser
was of legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages].
This evidence may be introduced either in mitigation of the charge or as a defense
to the charge itself; or
(2) A person who appears to a reasonable person to be actually or apparently under the
Page 140 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
influence of alcoholic beverages[, cannabis-infused beverages], controlled
substances, other intoxicating substances, or any of these substances in
combination, to the degree that the person may endanger any person or property, or
unreasonably annoy persons in the vicinity.
Section 56. KRS 244.150 is amended to read as follows:
Each licensee shall keep and maintain upon the licensed premises, or make readily
available upon request of the department or the Department of Revenue, adequate books
and records of all transactions involved in the manufacture, distribution, or sale of
alcoholic beverages[ and all transactions involved in the distribution or sale of cannabis-
infused beverages,] in the manner required by administrative regulations of the
department and the Department of Revenue.
Section 57. KRS 244.160 is amended to read as follows:
Whenever any alcoholic beverage[ or cannabis-infused beverage], in whatever quantity,
is found on any business premises within this state, a prima facie presumption shall arise
that the alcoholic beverage[ or cannabis-infused beverage] was upon the premises for the
purpose of sale.
Section 58. KRS 244.202 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) When the department seizes alcoholic beverages[ or cannabis-infused
beverages], within fourteen (14) days of the seizure it shall provide the
licensee with notice of the violation that formed the basis for the seizure under
KRS Chapters 241 to 244.
(b) If the department fails to properly provide this notice, the seized alcoholic
beverages[ or cannabis-infused beverages] shall be returned to the licensee.
(c) If the department provides proper notice, the licensee may request a hearing
before the board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B to determine if the
seizure was justified.
(2) An aggrieved party may appeal the board's final order in the Circuit Court of the
Page 141 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
county where the seizure occurred.
Section 59. KRS 260.852 is amended to read as follows:
It is the declared policy of the Commonwealth that hemp is a viable agricultural crop in
the Commonwealth. The purposes of KRS 260.850 to 260.869 are to:
(1) Promote the research and study methods of cultivating, processing, and marketing
hemp;
(2) Promote the expansion of the Commonwealth's hemp industry[ to the maximum
extent permitted by federal law] by allowing citizens of the Commonwealth to
cultivate, handle, or process hemp and hemp products for commercial purposes; and
(3) Move the Commonwealth and its citizens to the forefront of the hemp industry.
Section 60. KRS 260.858 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, it is lawful for a
licensee, or his or her agent, to cultivate, handle, or process hemp or hemp products
in the Commonwealth.
(2) It is unlawful for a person who does not hold a license issued by the Department of
Psychoactive Substances, or who is not an agent of a licensee, to cultivate, handle,[
process,] or market living hemp plants or viable seeds, leaf materials, or floral
materials derived from hemp. Penalties for persons who cultivate, handle, process,
or market living hemp plants or viable seeds, leaf materials, or floral materials
derived from hemp without a license are the same as those penalties that are
applicable to persons who violate KRS Chapter 218A, relating to marijuana.
(3) It is unlawful for a person who does not hold a license issued by the department, or
who is not an agent of a licensee, to possess hemp extract material having a[ delta-
9] tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in excess of three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%). Penalties for persons who possess such hemp extract materials without a
license are the same as those penalties that are applicable to persons who violate
KRS Chapter 218A, relating to marijuana.
Page 142 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
(4) [Nothing in ]This chapter shall not authorize[authorizes] any person to violate any
federal or state law or regulation.
Section 61. KRS 260.862 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other powers vested in it by law, the department shall have the
authority and power to promulgate administrative regulations to:
(a) License persons who wish to cultivate, handle,[ process,] or market hemp;
(b) Prescribe rules for a university's participation in, or affiliation with, any hemp
program;
(c) Prescribe sampling and testing procedures to ensure that hemp and hemp
products cultivated, handled,[ processed,] or marketed under the authority of
this section do not exceed the concentration levels defined in federal law as it
currently exists or as it may be subsequently amended;
(d) Prescribe rules for a licensed cultivator or licensed handler to sell hemp
floral material to a licensed medical cannabis processor, producer, or
dispensary as defined in KRS Chapter 218B so long as the harvested floral
material has been grown within the legal framework of the department's
hemp program and is tested in accordance with the Commonwealth's
medical cannabis program[Define classes or categories of hemp products
that are eligible for sale, transfer, or distribution to members of the public];
and
(e) Establish a schedule of nonrefundable fees for applicants and licensees.
(2) (a) A[No] person shall not cultivate, handle,[ process,] or market hemp in the
Commonwealth unless the person holds a license issued by the department.
(b) Any person seeking to cultivate hemp shall provide to the department the
legal description and global positioning coordinates sufficient for locating the
fields or greenhouses to be used to grow hemp.
(c) Any person seeking to cultivate or process hemp shall provide to the
Page 143 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
department prior written consent allowing representatives of the department,
the Department of Kentucky State Police, and other state and local law
enforcement agencies to enter onto all premises where hemp is cultivated,
processed, or stored for the purpose of conducting physical inspections or
ensuring compliance with the requirements of KRS 260.850 to 260.869 and
administrative regulations promulgated by the department.
(d) An applicant for a license issued by the department shall submit to and pay for
an annual criminal background check conducted by the Department of
Kentucky State Police or another state or federal law enforcement agency or
another entity selected by the department.
(e) A[No] person who has been convicted of any felony or any drug-related
misdemeanor or violation in the previous ten (10) years from the date of
application shall not be eligible to obtain a license, provided, however, that:
1. A person who was growing hemp lawfully with a license, registration,
or authorization under a pilot program authorized by Section 7606 of the
Agricultural Act of 2014, 7 U.S.C. sec. 5940, shall be eligible to obtain
a license to grow hemp; and
2. A person who was lawfully growing hemp under Section 7606 of the
Agricultural Act of 2014 before December 20, 2018, and was convicted
prior to December 20, 2018, shall be eligible to obtain a license to grow
hemp.
Section 62. KRS 260.8635 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "location" means a single contiguous parcel of land and any
buildings situated thereon.
(2) A[No] person shall not move or transport, or aid or abet another person in moving
or transporting, any intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid product[hemp extract
material] having a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in excess of three-
Page 144 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
tenths of one percent (0.3%):
(a) From any location outside the Commonwealth to any location within the
Commonwealth;
(b) From any location inside the Commonwealth to any location outside the
Commonwealth;[ or]
(c) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, from any location inside
the Commonwealth to any other location inside the Commonwealth; or
(d) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) A[ licensed] processor licensed by the Department of Psychoactive Substances, or
a person acting as a representative of a licensed processor, may move or transport
intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products[hemp extract material] having a
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in excess of three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%) from one (1) licensed processing location in the Commonwealth to another
licensed processing location in the Commonwealth, provided that:
(a) The intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products[hemp extract material]
shall move directly from one (1) licensed processing location to another; and
(b) The licensed processor shall provide written notice to the department of the
planned movement at least twenty-four (24) hours in advance to include the
following information:
1. The date of the movement;
2. The address of the origin;
3. The address of the destination; and
4. Other information required by the department.
(4) A licensed processor, or a person acting as a representative of a licensed
processor, may move or transport intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid
products having a total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in excess of three-
tenths of one percent (0.3%) from one (1) licensed processing location to another
Page 145 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1643
licensed processing location if:
(a) The intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products move directly from
one (1) licensed processing location to another;
(b) The licensed processor provides written notice to the department of the
planned movement at least twenty-four (24) hours in advance to include the
following information:
1. The date of the movement;
2. The address of the origin;
3. The address of the destination; and
4. Other information required by the department; and
(c) The intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products are transported from
the Commonwealth to a license holder in another state where that state's
hemp program accepts the transport of the intermediate hemp-derived
cannabinoid products from another state and the transportation is not
transported through a state that does not permit such transport.
Section 63. The Department of Agriculture, Department for Public Health, and
the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall transfer all licensee and licensing
data to the Department of Psychoactive Substances for any area of their jurisdiction
related to market participant licensing that has been transferred to the Department of
Psychoactive Substances in Sections 1 to 62 of this Act.
Section 64. The following KRS sections are repealed:
243.401 Department to regulate distribution and retail sale of cannabis-infused
beverages -- Conditions for sale -- Sales to persons under age 21 prohibited --
Permitted activities by manufacturers -- Shipping and delivery.
243.403 Cannabis-infused beverage retail package license -- Requirements --
Conditions.
243.405 Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license -- Requirements -- Conditions.
Page 146 of 146
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:01 PM Jacketed